If you are only listening to pundits and news sources that believe as you do, and you’re only soliciting opinions from people in your socioeconomic strata, regardless of where that strata lies, then you’re part of the problem of divisiveness in this country. You’re not educating yourself, and you’re not helping make things better. All you’ve done is join a club.
TO WIN: follow ROOST, check out the Royal Design Studio stencils, and leave a comment to say which one you'd choose. And I'd love to hear what project you have in mind!
Morgan Brayton ... Helen Duncan
But Devil’s Kiss is a grim, dark story. It’s not your usual paranormal romance where the girl gets the boy and they all live happily ever after. I wanted the horror and brutality of the world Billi lives in to be authentic and sincere, she’s playing for the highest stakes imaginable.
3. The kids holding the Habs’ flags at the player’s entrance? Kept trying to trip everyone!
have done to my fellow man along the way.
Well for a bunch of random bits a pieces in my dream that I didn’t really think would lead me anywhere I sure have seen that I need to continue on this journey towards my recovery but it is obviously the end of an identity that I fear. Also, I am in need of some additional love and acceptance that I’m not currently getting. Finally, I need to use this time to think about my career path and where I really would like it to go.
So today I'm thanking God for giving us gifts that we don't even ask for or feel we deserve. For a beautiful voice and a chance to share it, dropped on the lap of a normal boy. For the chance to accept a meal for free, when you've worked hard all your life long. For a chance to be the one who brings the meal, when you had nothing to do with preparing it or paying for it. For a chance to witness the involuntary prayers of strangers and friends-to-be. For holy, salty, messy tear prayers that speak when my words can't.
Major: Securities Laws and Finance
PUTAR: Of course his presence will please Australia’s largest trading partner.
We thought our readers might like to know more about Sierra Gorda so we recently caught up with Martha “Pati” Ruiz Corzo (MPRC) for a quick interview.
He spends a lot of time alone, because the maintenance is crippling
“I couldn’t believe she’d shoot me.”
Lips so sweet and tender, like petals falling apart
The two men did “a lot of soul-searching” and realized that many companies were focused on value capture and driven by greed, which was why the economy had taken a turn for the worse. “Everyone had been sitting at the table and stuffing their faces without thinking about the next meal,” says Harthorne.
"There were more dances, and there were forfeits and more dances, and there was cake, and there was negus and there was a great piece of Cold Roast, and there was a great piece of Cold Boiled, and there were mince pies and plenty of beer."
Natalie presents her own cookbook, Dulcie May Kitchen: Everyday: a visual celebration of everyday, fuss-free dishes with a modern twist.
Trade mark licensing then came under the spotlight with special attention to competition law issues and territorial restrictions. Finally we touched on IP rights in products that turned out to derivative products in Global Coal.
For web based products at least, there's another very powerful technique: release early and iterate. The sooner you can start testing your ideas, the sooner you can start fixing them.
3. If you use a Woodware USA stamp, you get an extra entry into our monthly drawing!
Mine are 5, 6, 9, 12, and 17.
Here are my "in progress" pictures, followed by pretty much done pictures! And after looking at them, I need to take some better photos! Maybe I'll do that tomorrow! These don't even show the final paint done... You can see where we had lots of patching to do!! It used to be my son's bedroom and let me tell you.... he had a dart board up and I think I covered a million holes!!!! But I am so happy with it all, everything has a spot!!! It was worth the 12 year wait!!!!!
World rights? That makes sense. You need to be the only creatures on the planet with the right to make the movie.
The Beat
And, so, the saga of the Blue Ribbon Commission began. Another of those damned-if-you-do, damned-if-you-don’t moments. There was an outcry that the GOSA directed the district to investigate… it needed to be independent. There was an outcry from the legislative delegation that the school board needed to control it. There was an outcry from the education community that the board being involved represents a conflict of interest. There was an outcry that it wouldn’t be independent if the district paid for it…
Get your audience to participate by posting the contest on your site. If the winner heard about the contest on your site, you will both win the prize!
"Sadly, no." Rissad jerked his head upwards, toward the looming concrete door. "I came here for that. I only found out about the Abyss after I got here."
“Save your money because it's not cheap to get into,” is Robinson’s advice to aspiring craft beer canners, but he adds in definitive tone: “We believe that cans are a superior vessel for the transportation of craft beer.”
KH: I think you should focus on building your skills and portfolio, then worry later about getting paid for doing it. And assess what works for you and what doesn’t. I started doing kid’s portraits and later realized my true passion was weddings, so I am focusing on that right now.
So many of my early moves were due to burned bridges; out of options for making it 'work" in one locale, I picked up and moved somewhere else, hoping for a fresh start. Some of the moves were due to the military or other jobs. In fact, I could list and explain each one of the moves in a way that would make sense to even the most analytical mind.
And if you have subscribed to my newsletter or facebook page there is an EXTRA 10% OFF COUPON just for you.
Freedom is the freedom to say that two plus two makes four.
Good news is on the horizon! Due to advances in medical and rehabilitative care your client’s health is fully restored in three years. The bad news is that he is three years older, broke, bankrupt, and may have lost his home and/or business. Could a properly designed life insurance policy with the right features have prevented this financial catastrophe?
Desert Marigold
Lesson #4 learned: Morning sessions are pretty draining when it comes to having to go out and start drinking beer again later in the afternoon. I forced a pint of Dorado Double IPA down at Ballast Point and then switched to scotch, Captain & Coke, and back to a tall boy of Miller Lite (at a concert) to round out the day.
everything you know
SO! I woke up at the prescribed time this morning, a first...well, at most a fifth...in Chloe history! Be proud of me, gorammit!
OK I can’t take this Brenner guy anymore! He’s literally made me puke twice now! The jest of HIS story is that we are somehow suppose to believe that having sex with animals is as normal as applie pie and mother. What in the HELL has the HUMAN SPECIES COME TO? Who in the HELL considers SEXUAL INTERCOURSE WITH ANIMALS NORMAL? I’m not buying this load of BULLSHIT for one second! This guy needed HELP in his younger days IMO! Badly!! He sexually violated an animal by his own admission and wants us to believe he was acting normally? WTF?
Visiting Assistant Professor Position in Mineralogy/Petrology
the edges are slightly distressed with my distress tool and white acrylic paint,
Since completing my speech last week, I have been practicing every day. I have memorized about 85% of my speech so far. I even added a new paragraph today to make my speech longer. I timed myself, and it’s almost 7 minutes.
Place cleaned ramps into a glass jar or a lidded plastic container (one that is safe for heating) and pour boiling liquid over them. Weigh down so that ramps are completely submerged. Let cool to room temperature, then store covered in refrigerator for about a week.
In this version it seems that event happened three years prior, and Barbara has actually regained the use of her legs and is now very anxious to take down some criminals. And so in the opening story, we see her confront a group of home invaders, she gains a somewhat irritating new roommate, a villain named the Mirror is introduced, and then we end on a cliff hanger. My main beef is the continuing use of the first person narration via captions, which have essentially replaced thought bubbles in modern comics. They have that weary, jaded tone that's in every comic, I wouldn't mind seeing something different. But this is a decent reboot, and Batgirl's costume, a little more textured, looks good back on Babs.
~Winston Churchill
This is how it happened in my eyes: Colby approached me first with a "Hey girl" and a big hug. Cool. He looked great, and he looked happy.
Singer’s essay is not horribly long, but I don’t want to post my response to it in one large post…that would be a little overwhelming. For me and for you.
Together we enjoy adventure;
Okay, so here we go...didn't get a good pic of the dresser before and honestly it wasn't in horrible condition. Structurally sound but some nasty contact paper inside drawers and someone decided to paint the inside and outside of drawers crimson. Really?
Perhaps it goes without saying that I didn’t stop being a geek: the following year, when my friend Colleen communicated my romantic interest directly to Michelle, Michelle reportedly laughed out loud, an event from which I am still recovering. But I had found a comfortable niche in the junior-high-school (and later high-school) social ecology, and it was a niche in which I could thrive on my own terms.
Fixed vs NL Texas Hold’em + Test
I don't know if Annika is a product of the YouTube generation or just generally confident and optimistic. I listen to her almost every week asking me to put a video of her on YouTube so she could become a YouTube sensation like Justin Bieber or whoever else.Now, she's motivated to try out for American Idol. I keep telling her that's fine and good, but she's got to practice.
The day progressed beautifully, the weather could not have been any more pleasant, and all of my favorite people arrive. The Jacksons were there, Miss Jordan, Miss Stockton, Miss Haskins, Mr. Ramsey, and of course the Doctor, myself, Miss Bosworth and Mr. McCarty. All were in their best looks, and after some light refreshments, Mr. Ramsey, the Doctor, and Mr. McCarty found a suitable clearing for a relaxed game of Cricket. Miss Bosworth, myself, Miss Haskins and Miss Stockton all went to watch them. The gentlemen looked dashing as always, and scandalized us all in taking off their coats, for ease of playing. They put on a very good show of flexing and strutting, and at one point I believe the Doctor began the great crack in our Cricket bat. After being bored of watching the gentlemen show off, I demanded they give each of us ladies a turn. It was quite fun, and I did indeed hit the ball hard enough to allow me a quick jaunt to the other wicket, though I got arrogant and made an attempt to run back for a second point, in which Mr. Ramsey and Mr. McCarty no longer wanted to play gently and struck me out. I was quite put out and made a show of it, but all knew I had no ill sentiments about the entire thing. Miss Bosworth was our last to the bat, as after her second hit the bat split completely in two! Mr. McCarty claims he can repair it, and we all made great sport with Miss Bosworth, claiming she was a lion!
Car Singing, my friends, is an art form that I have developed over years and years of ridding in cars. I no longer do the whole half hearted, kind of singing along, easy to pretend I am on bluetooth in case that old man creeper in the next car looks in my window. No. I car sing like I am on American Idol and this is my last chance to prove I deserve to make it to the final episode.
It’s the welcome the rookie to the NFL game, at home against Luck (most likely) and the Colts on 10/14.
For those that aren’t familiar, George’s Island is smack dab in the middle of the Halifax harbour. And I truly do love this city!! So full of talented and creative individuals. It has its faults but overall it is a winner in my books.
Atrocities occur, and when they do, they should be and are harshly dealt with accordingly. Louis Farrakhan's implication that murder and rape are the standard operating procedure of the United States armed forces is disgusting and unsupportable by any evidence whatsoever. Woe to him who calls good, evil and evil, good, "Minister" Farrakhan.
I do have one problem already though - I don't seem to be able to add another blogger blog to blogpress lite as it doesn't like it! Has anyone else had any success there if you are using blogpress life for the iPhone?
Pendurra, Conrwall was a brilliantly entrancing setting. I could almost feel the magic in the air and there's a tangible sense of something mysterious and unseen to normal human eyes about the place. The possibility that anything could happen is very real and Pendurra almost seems like it's from another time with residents who are enigmatic and mysterious.
The small press is a wonderful resource for aspiring authors to see their work published, but if you’re not careful it can also turn and bite you on the ass. As I still retain all rights to my work, my hope is to have another publisher pick my book up, dust it off, and make it available on their shelves. Yes, I know I can self-publish, but it just won’t feel the same to me… you know what I’m saying?
Maybe you got lots of lovely crafting goodies for Christmas and "need" to try them out? Why not join in the challenge at Sir Stampalot where the theme this month is "monochromatic".
Another couple of trips up the the lodge in February and March produced a number of interesting sightings too. These included the three Sohebele male lions that were now the only surviving members of the pride following the death of the last lionesses in March after she was killed by the Xakubasa lionesses when she arrived to try and feed off a giraffe kill of theirs.
Me: Oh, well, Father. I have officially been crowned the Queen of Cock!
Can I just say how incredibly hard it is to take a picture of a Christmas tree? Or is it just me? I took about 10 pictures in a row and all of them were blurry.
You need to show us exactly where!
One of the ways the people of Romania first made their views felt was by rioting. They were looting too, but out of desperation rather than greed. The reaction of the police was key, and this was how what happened in Romania was different from what happened in London: in some places the police tried to stop it, in others they looked the other way, and in yet others they joined in. I suppose this was the most obvious sign that law and order had truly broken down. I learnt a lot, and I felt that the soulless and constant struggle for life in this depressing and austere place came over very well. The love stories and deceptions were convincing, and all the more devastating for that.
I hope to feel writing inspiration return to me soon. For now, I’m just reading and enjoying all of your writing. Thanks for following and a bigger thanks for all the incredible writing I’m seeing out there from everyone.
He's not stupid, no. But, he's just not deep, all right? Woman of the moment. Urge of the moment. "Bros before babes," and all that pseudo-deep pseudo-manliness that goes with it. Except for his place on the swim team, and his friendship with his best-friend-since he was tiny, to Tristan, most things aren't worth hanging onto even for a day. His friends call him "manslut" without exaggeration. His girlfriend of the moment professed undying love at a bonfire - and about a half hour later, he was swapping spit with some other girl.
There were warm hugs, firm handshakes and lots of Swiss kissing amidst the general whooping and hollering that occurs when people in the meeting industry get together. White wine and orange juice were served as we cruised close to shore surrounded by an impossibly beautiful Alpine setting. Our journey had started, the inaugural Ovation Trophy was underway. But this was just the prologue, the calm before the storm. The bravado, nonchalant weighing up of the competition before the game begins.
In the age of blogs, Facebook profiles and pages, everyone is beginning to develop an opinion to share. The benefit of this technological age is that now all of those wishes, opinions and great ideas found on the Internet can be turned into polished novels. Before the Internet and self-publishing existed, traditionally you had to have connections or preexisting street credit (and a quality and marketable book! - ED) to strike a deal with a publishing house in order to get a paltry 5 or 10% in royalties. This is not the case now.
Heavy. And not at all like the man I’ve become, who doesn’t even care what people think while his remains are still up and walking around, cutting people off in traffic and sighing loudly as that lady in front of him pays with a check in the supermarket.
And so, I'm walking down some suburban street when I hear a woman cry out in anger over the sound of me music. I slip my Walkman ear-plugs down. It looks like her partner is giving her a hard time.
What a wonderful time of year it is when we can start gathering food from the wild again! Now if I could just get my hands on some fiddleheads and wild leek, life would be perfect. But without further ado, I give you, knotweed quiche.
- Catch up on sleep or refill on Starbucks Pumpkin Spice Lattes!
Given the wide dispersal of task force ships, long range High Frequency radio (HF) had to be used. That choice also meant a very low bandwidth for data. Smart communications people came up with an ingenious method to transmit information among NTDS equipped ships. A modified Radio Tele-Type would transmit (and receive, of course) information. Using a master/slave timesharing system (a simplex system, as opposed to a multiplex to you commo types) the master would query each NTDS ship in turn to update the shared air warfare picture. Each ship in the network would listen in to each transmission. Having done so, all ships would have the same picture of all tracks in sensor range of the formation, even from distant radar pickets up to 400 miles away.
What continually struck me was how odd such a lead pairing was. Tatum, who I’ve only previously seen in Dear John and the like, demonstrated a remarkable flair for comedic scenes, perhaps because of his pairing with Hill, who co-wrote the remake. Inevitably, it should lead to many more chances to expose a side that has rarely been seen on screen thus far.
So when Affiliated Agent J of New Jersey contacted me about using one of his very, very unique talents in a mission, I immediately said, "YES!"
2037: Year That Federal Debt Will Reach 200 Percent Of GDP. (CBO, 6/22/11)
How do you know the person who passed the book on to you?
"Lemme take you to the Candy Shop..." like most 50 Cent lyrics I find even thinking this in the tune of his jams both catchy and inappropriate, plus this post is supposed to be my "Photo Wednesday": Candy Shop centric post and so far I have you thinking bout a over-hyped rapper instead of a new entrepreneurial venture on Franklin Avenue, which is, ta da: "The Candy Shop"!
Now, before this sounds too cynical (like anything I ever say sounds cynical. Psh.), I’d like to say that these two things do serve a purpose. Sure, it’s lazy as hell to sit on your ass while a giant circle cleans your house, but at least that’s a purpose. Predating these two things however, was the moving sidewalk. Moving. Fuck. Sidewalk. Really, this marked the beginning of the end of us as a species. And no one seems concerned but me!
This photo is so "behind the scene" LOL!
Warsaw Ghetto (Rap Mix)
Author, raw food advocate, “Raw Family,” “12 Steps to Raw food,” “Eating Without Heating”
Near the end of my week-long stay in Ireland, I traveled to the south coast village of Cobh. Along the way I spent a couple hours at the Botanical Garden in Fota. The foliage displays at Fota are very extensive and offer a tremendous variety of plants between the garden-proper and the arboretum. Looking back, I wish I would have taken the time to jot down the names of several of the flowers, but I guess not having that information gives me one more reason to return!
Republicans and Democrats outlined separate deficit-reduction proposals Monday afternoon, pushing ahead with bills that have a questionable chance of passing as the showdown over the debt ceiling intensified…. – Fox News, 7-25-11
Councillor Mike O’Brien, Portfolio Holder for Community Safety and Customer Contact, said “We are running a series of events for dog owners and those interested in getting a dog and they aim to be informative and fun.
- travel to Europe and back
poised importantly at my ear.
Wed - Homemade Chicken Nuggets with potato salad. Chicken comes marinated and has a shake and bake seasoning packet.
They had a refrigerator from England right there, and their only job was to make a copy of it. Lord knows, they made an exact replica, but there must have been some secrets that they still hadn’t grasped: a tube in the condenser coil would clog, or it would produce so much cold that everything would freeze. Buyers would return the refrigerators with complaints and curses: “The damned thing won’t stay cold!” The stores would submit claims for replacement.
It had to be
“If 80,000 people wanted to cause trouble, it would have been a much, much worse outcome.
for Mr. Zelaya, who embraced the leftist populism of Hugo Chavez."
The comic industry is on weak legs and it’s easy to see why. Comic book writers can’t get over their own obsession with continuity, or their love melodramatic, pretentious bullshit to tell good, simple stories about super heroes stopping super villains from destroying the world or what not. This is just as much of a problem with DC as it is with Marvel. While I do prefer DC, it would be unfair of me to trash Marvel without calling out DC for doing the same stupid shit. Although, DC’s stupidity is often in different areas, such as randomly killing off characters for shock value, whether or not it adds any meaning to the story or not.
Because guess what, pioneers didn't have bbq chips!
I especially like this excerpt from the article: “An individual’s positive judgment based on their efficacy promotes active involvement in activities and contributes to the growth of competencies needed in that activity.” In other words, the self-efficacy learned on the trail carries over in a positive way into the life of the child outside of camp.
I got to catch up with some people I met when I couchsurfed across America a couple of years ago and also got to finally meet Siri. She took me for a delicious brunch at Teddy's -I had the Rancheros, she had the Strawberry and Blueberry Pancakes- and we talked about her tiny home island in Washington and the perils of deadlines. She also introduced me to Toby's Estate Coffee, a really good coffee place which has recently opened, with a big industrial coffee grinder in the corner and lots of coffee related classic design pieces on display but a joint I think to be taken with a pinch salt as it really is a hipster palace. I've never seen so many handsome haircuts, leather boots or well-selected sunglasses under one roof.
well this subject of today is Cosplay in the main place xD
“They were great, brave men, but do not forget that they were men…these extraordinary men loved, hurt, and laughed with the rest of us…. The images that their loved ones will remember …will not be those of them fast roping out of a helo. Rather, the images that will bring both joy and agony in their minds are those of a gentle smile, a goofy laugh, a knowing look… These were Americans hoping what we all hope; that their families will be able to live the best life possible; that opportunity would abound.”
Tori did not get out of her pyjamas that day. She laid listlessly in bed, watching the dust travel a shaft of light that pierced out of her closed curtains. She had been feeling fine up until that point.
Light is the same way.
Grandma had roses, lilies, calamus growing dense in front of the storied house. I helped her step on ants my one trip to Cleveland, the summer I was four. She took me to visit all her friends and made me play “Volga Boatman” on their upright pianos. She gave me a pink seashell and a tiny doll in a handmade red silk dress. She gave me a record she made for me about her father and the fourteen pears.
I should note here that all of the above is pure, undiluted ex post facto rationalization for a bunch of XP benchmarks that were, in all probability, made up without any rhyme or reason, or at least not as much as we might wish. My general feeling is that, in practice, the differences in XP benchmarks don't mean a lot till you're in the mid to high levels anyway. Likewise, I'm pretty dismissive of trying to balance one class against another based on some "objective" calculus, since, especially in an old school game, so much of any character's effectiveness depends heavily on his player and the referee. That's not to say I don't find articles like Crabaugh's interesting and occasionally useful, only that, as I get older, I find I care less and less about the fact that the buff cleric needs 500 XP less than the fighter, while the weakling MU needs 500 more.
Many of you are going to the Bronx Zoo tomorrow. Enjoy the trip. Please see the homework assignment – PARTS A & B – that is due Thursday. Period 4 students, note that I have decided to push back the due date for the reading to Friday.
Our daily exchanges can have baraka. Take, for example, this exchange I had with a man who is a car guardian. This is when I get in the car to drive away. I am giving him 20 cents for his car guarding, and he’s helping me navigate out of my parking space into traffic.
Kimba eventually tired herself out and fell half fucked across the bonnet of a car, buck naked and flaked out. Then some roly-poly Sunday morning church-goer from across the street comes the Good Samaritan and goes up to her real slow with a blanket held out at arms length like he’s an adventurous animal hunter approaching a dangerous armadillo, and this blanket of his was some ugly fluffy polyester thing with a classic picture of Gentle Jesus on it surrounded by Disney characters. At this point Party Time moved from pondering to action and went up to the Nice Man.
What piece of clothing never fits you properly?
The present air-ground-logistics capabilities of the III Marine Expeditionary Force (III MEF), coupled with the USAF air assets at Kadena Air Force Base, are considered to be a critical counterbalance to offset China’s military growth and aggressive pursuit of natural resources in the region. The US military forces in Okinawa and Japan proper have also developed into a humanitarian response force capable of providing rapid assistance to nations in the region that are overwhelmed by natural disasters.
The latest version of our cards (1.5) is now available for download and is licensed under Creative Commons – Attribution-Noncommercial-No Derivative Works 2.5.
worn out but DH found one roller in fairly good condition and another that is still OK for
Her eyes are closed
The cat rules the dog because the dogs stupid. I don’t know why this was even thought of to be honest, it just makes you think hooooooooooooow!! and Whyyyyyyyyyyyyyy would you do that?
I've taken the suggestions here to heart, and tried to incorporate them as best I can.
I’ve tried both approaches. I am beginning to like being dead honest more then lying.
But then I understood. On average, most people keep their cars four or five years. That's a suitable, perhaps even excessive, period of mourning. But it's a way to get, as the psychobabble people have it, closure.
After of all, I'm beatlemania. The Beatles is a big part in my songs. Also I love British folk. In my iPod, there are Nick Drake, Bert Jansch, John Renbourn, Marc Brierley, Jackson C. Frank, Jackie McAuley, Roy Harper, Heron, Spirogyra, Forest, Fairport Convention.
I could sit for hours, and gaze with delight at that view, with no need for any more. Of course walking over and gently inserting a finger, tongue or cock would be unlikely to be unpleasant.
While I have oft spoken of my guruji, I have never written much about him, though I have heard so much.
So we headed up the AUT 15 with me in a somewhat foul mood, but the beautiful day soon got me over it. Things are pretty flat in this part of Quebec, which only makes the rearing backdrop of the Mont Royal all the more striking. My GPS was practically useless in Canada, so I'd fired up the laptop with Streets & Trips, and Jack was balancing it on his knee as we tried to figure out where to go.
I've always thought that once we become a society who doesn't care about animals, that humans are next.
- England: hand-made sugar plum Christmas tree with Criminally Bad Elf Barleywine 10.5% ABV
2.D. FUEL SHUTOFF AND ENGINE KILL SWITCH
I was on a roll last night, so I'll be posting more cards soon.
I finished Caleb's quilt this afternoon. Took about 10 hours total. Hopefully next time it will go by faster now that I know what I'm doing.
Most teachers I know do not teach for the paycheck, the benefits, or the schedule. They teach for the love of teaching. They love working with students, they love spending their days in the classroom and not the office, and they love how they sleep so well at night knowing that their days’ efforts were not spent in vain.
07. Limehouse Blues (P. Braham-D. Furber) 2:41
Tour only merchandise: City Center "Highwire Days" tape (only 50 made, Ryan-heavy unrealized jams with paper catastrophe covers), Swimsuit "Life Style" tape (50, crazy live recording in classic Joy Division-everything's broken style), BOX OF SAND 3-tape box... (strictly limited to 50, one tape of Swimsuit's new album, two split tapes with a side each of solo material from each member!), Swimsuit SURFIN' RAT t-shirts... also gonna have Redeemer on LP and CD, a few of the Swimsuit 45s, a couple of the remaining Grouper/City Center splits and some beautiful and amazing tour posters made by Michelle Flemming and delivered surprise style!!!!!!!!!!! Please come to one of the gigs and support your homies, one tape = one gallon of gas!!!! WHAT THE HELL????!!!! SEE YOU SOON!!!
*”You know, there are some parts of town where we can run into people I worked with.”
I spoke to Gordito on the phone a couple of days later. In that call I specifically asked him if he was with “Internal Affairs.” He stated, “Yes.” When I advised him that I was unable to find any information about the “Internal Affairs” unit, he then said that it was actually with the “Professional Standards” unit. Are you thinking now that maybe this guy does not know who he is at all? Because that’s what it sounds like to me.
- Tickets go on sale Monday, April 2nd at 7:30 AM for $25.
'When the surgeon asked me for my permission to amputate my leg, he told me I was very lucky to be alive. He said by the day after, I would have been a dead man.
Pulse: 96
A voice calls out from one of the huge holes that form
It was also electric, which I love because I can just plug it in and go
I want you to hear those stories too! I want you to have the opportunity to share your stories so we are looking for guest contributors.
The average reader of e-books says she has read 24 books (the mean number) in the past 12 months, compared with an average of 15 books by a non-e-book consumer. Some 78% of those ages 16 and older say they read a book in the past 12 months. Those readers report they have read an average (or mean number) of 17 books in the past year and 8 books as a median (midpoint) number.
I walked to City Hall today, and on my way I looked for something to prove that winter is giving way to spring -- apart from the longer days. The canal was quiet and rutted, but still locked in ice. And skaters filled the Rink of Dreams at City Hall. But along the pathway, in the bright sunlight, I found a hint of green and a hint of warmer days to come.
I am not going to write about each one individually, you need to see for yourself just how awesome they all are:-
TALLAHASSEE, FLORIDA At least 5 people will face charges ranging from misdemeanor to felonies in the hazing death of FAMU Band Member, Robert Champion. Some students claim that his death was a result of his sexual orientation. CLICK BELOW FOR FULL STORY
bonkei doogu 盆景道具
Your legs are long and firm. You are slender yet shapely.
We made it before the dam broke, barely, at 10:00 on the button, and I was so pleased upon arriving there to see that, even though it was just the four of us, they were prizing us with the big round table near the front of the restaurant, the most snug little set-up in the joint where we could look out over all the other patrons while enjoying our own private little corner. I feel safe there, with plenty of room to enjoy my apple butter and coffee, with plenty of floor space for my kids to throw food and those little Cracker Barrel game pegs on, surrounded by walls on two sides, a walkway on the third and only one other table on the last. (Meaning there would be only one table of people to apologize to for ruining their meal by sitting in their vicinity.)
_____Decided to try being as honest as possible with everyone today. So now I'm single, homeless, unemployed, banned from our local church, pub and supermarket, and on the run from the law. Best policy, my arse.
The following extract was taken from Professor Rushton’s Race, Evolution, and Behavior - A Life History Perspective. My only reason for publishing this extract is to give readers some perspective on this issue. I also believe that the best way to do this is to go back in history.
Lorraine: "Get off of me!"
Being both an actor and a photographer of sorts, I’m blessed with some decent instincts about how to take a headshot (the one problem this does create is the intense wish that I could somehow take my own, simply because I know exactly what I want. Alas).
The wind to the willow, while whistling along:
Cored and filled with triple sec—it is as fun as it is tasty
Damien Hirst
As the tree identifies trouble and responds in a life-preserving manner, so mankind, Christ tells us, needs a life-preserver. And as the shedding of the summer leaves is only beneficial if rains soon come, so our best efforts achieve nothing without Christ’s living water.
Jack-"Where are we, dad?"
Take the Heptonstall road up from Hebden Bridge, going round the village (not into it) and head through Slack and onto Colden. Just as the road begins to go downhill to Colden, note the small single-track road on your right called Edge Road. Go on here for a good mile until it becomes a dirt-track and there, on your left, is the half-run-down old farmhouse called New Edge. Just yards past it, off to the right by the trackside, you’ll see this large copper-coloured stone basin oozing with the same-coloured liquid.
Friend: "Oh, I know...but people think that all accountants are boring and I don't want to be stereotyped."
Lastly, on miniatures and transporting them: my homemade carrying case is falling apart, and I could really use a new transport. I’m looking at Portable Warfare, because they’re the only company so far that I’ve seen making a bright orange transport bag. You won’t ever misplace that sucker. It’s bright freaking orange. So I’m trying to save up for that, and I’ve started a ChipIn for it. It’s a little fundraiser thing, where people can donate. You can find it here. I’ve got an Etsy shop where I sell dice bags and such, and you can use the coupon code THNXMUCH for 15% off your order. I’d much prefer to sell a few dice bags, so please spread the word, and pass the coupon code along too!
** “doctrine of the motion of the Earth…is contrary to the Holy Scriptures and therefore cannot be defended or held”
I ended my day with a nice dinner and an early bedtime. The following day I wasn't going to leave until late in the afternoon, giving me time to visit my friend Sadelle and drive through the countryside to enjoy the fall colors. It was an exhausting but very enjoyable weekend. Would I go back? Not likely what with the crowds. If I do I'd most likely visit one of the other fiber festivals in the area and focus on meeting up with my friends. But Rhinebeck is still an experience I'll remember and say, "Yep, I've done it."
seek. and you will find.
So that brings me to the subject of school lunches.
It was kind of surreal to look over the little development sheet they give parents at these routine preventative appointments.
I'm a coked-out cokewhore headed to the corner store..." etc. etc.
"...the best bleacher bum since Pete Axthelm" -- Randy K.
Probably the most interesting news to date surrounding the new release is that Kubuntu has a new sugar daddy. They’re no longer being funded by Canonical, so that Canonical can focus all of its resources on the sinking ship that is Ubuntu. They are now sponsored by the extraordinarily mysterious Blue Systems. Nobody seems to know anything about this company and their website just has a list of the open source projects they sponsor. (it’s probably a Microsoft front company ) Whoever they are, they seem to sponsor only KDE and KDE distributions, but that’s fine with me because I love KDE. So, as long as they keep the money rolling in, I’m happy with them.
Math: Saxon Algebra. Math isn't my strongest subject (right, Dad?) so Saxon is perfect for me and for Wyatt. It repeats/reviews problems from lesson to lesson to make sure you're actually getting it. Plus, there is a companion CD set that has the availability to take you step by step through each problem (yes, really, each problem in the book) in case you're just not getting it.
Right that is it.
The big night arrived. Bob made his way on stage in front of the studio and TV audience. He had become the talk of the town. He was the best guest this show had ever seen. The host stepped up to the microphone.
I was supposed to meet Mark at the bar at 8:30, but I was about fifteen minutes late (it was totally worth it, but that’ll have to be a different post). As I leaned in to hug him, I could smell the alcohol on his breath. He flagged down the server and ordered another cherry vodka and Red Bull, but the glass was about ¾ full of vodka with only a splash of Red Bull. He had about four of these over the course of our date, and he admitted to drinking before coming to the bar too. Normally, that wouldn’t bother me, but he had to have his brother drop him off at the bar. Needless to say, the date was awful.
The thought process created the outcome.
I'm eating up all of the compliments I get on how "small" I am for only having 10 weeks left and how my face looks good. I've never been called "small" before and the fact that people tell me that while 7.5 months pregnant? I'll gladly take it and smile. I feel good about how I've managed so far.
This creation used the stretchier of the jerseys. It was donated, along with a ton of other less appealing animal printed sample fabric, to the charity I work for by a digital fabric printing company. Thus this fabric fulfills the 'secondhand/unwanted' requirement I place on fabric I use to make garments with. I used a tried and tested pattern I developed yonks ago that is fairly fitted in the body with a scoop neck, 1/2 sleeves and gathered sleeve heads. I would love to have a photo of myself wearing this top to show you. I would be all styled up in my black Jenny pencil skirt with black high heels and red lipstick, but alas I haven't had an opportunity to rock a look that sharp in recent times. Hopefully such an occassion will arise during Me-Made-May '12.
About 12million Ilegal immigrants live in the Us from all over the world. 104 million people live in extreme poverty in Mexico, since th US is their neigbors they go there to get a better life. Actually during the Bush admiinistration the US gained 3 million more ilegal immigrants aproximately. The Us not only has ilegal mexicans, there are a great number of people from centran and south america and the caribean living in the US. There are chinese people, arabs people from all over the world live ilegaly in the US.
can't say i'm looking terribly forward to it a whole day of missioning. what with the having the cooties the whole week.
Using Dove's Most Advanced technology, these conditioners make your hair smooth! I used the Intensive Repair Conditioner on days that I straighten my hair and feel that it needs something extra to make up for the damage. This conditioner does feel a bit ticker than some other conditioners, but in a good way. It does a great job at restoring my hair's moisture!
Asked about IGP Ismail’s denial that the police car hit protesters, Su said this was nothing unusual and from what he usually reads in news, the country’s leaders distort the facts.
To develop their method, the researchers looked at data from six major world markets — the U.S., the U.K., Germany, Japan, China, and India — from the beginning of 2000 to the end of 2010. Choosing the leading stocks in each market, the team then mapped the correlations between the groups of stocks from each country over the 11-year period. With the exception of China, which tended to operate independently, the researchers discovered an interesting pattern of interdependencies between these markets. Some markets, such as the U.K. and U.S., were closely connected, as predicted. But there were also surprising findings, such the fact that Japan fluctuates in its financial alignment between western and eastern countries.
PAS, DAP and PKR continued to bicker publicly over trivial issues, heedless of their common goal of toppling BN.
Ben is SUPER smart and has been wonderful to train. He is learning lots of new commands (some he knew, but didn’t always obey, like “sit”), and others I assume are new to him. As of today, he is following the “sit” and “down” (lay down) commands, and after a few days of work, he is finally starting to “leave it.” That will be helpful when we are on walks and he wants to chase every cat in sight. LOL! Up next is “stay” and then we will see what we can do about starting clicker training and some more complicated commands. I even wonder if he would enjoy lure coursing. Many Basenji’s do.
2. … blog.
to the far end of town.
Years after The Circle of Magic and the Circle Opens series by Tamora Pierce, the four friends are reunited. Except everything isn’t as fine and dandy as we would expect. There was no happy homecoming for the three returning friends, as they discover that they are no longer able to return to their old home. Nor is it a happy reunion for Sandry, who never left, as she feels by herself when her friends not only refuse to contact her when they return, but also that they refuse to reopen their old bond. As the one who was left behind, she feels abandoned and forgotten.
I feel must just accept
Easing up on yourself is also part of the picture — a nice combination, don’t you think: making progress and not beating up on yourself that it’s taken so long. With the Sun in a cooperative link to Chiron, look for evidence that you’ve actually done quite well with the standstill energies of late and achieved quite a bit. If evidence doesn’t jump out at you, look for opportunities, even tiny ones, to treat yourself gently and kindly. (In fact, do that even if you’re awash in evidence of achievement.)
June 14th, 2011 Villa il Trebbiolo becomes our “home away from home” for reflection and transformation with the first retreat led by the one and only Scott. It’s our hope to be part of the continuing story, offering relaxing and life-changing experiences at this historic Tuscan site.
Then she said, "Sell my new car, take my front door key away from me
We also got to spend Thanksgiving with some wonderful friends and family which i have included so pictures.... We had a blast it was nice to be able to celebrate with each other and share with each other what we were thankful for. I feel so blessed to have some awesome friends and family in my life to help guide me in the direction.
So I went in there and removed as many as I could before I couldn't stand
I made a decent mid-level campaign out of it. My teenage sweethearts’ Elf character Noradama “Nord” Calingref won Castle Krake in a card game, and took her adventurer pals along with her to clear out the Slime God, and the Type 4 Demon and ghoul army of Krakesbourough. That Walking Wet scenario is hella cool, and is pure Judges Guild.
A two-wetsuit job.
...the time I accidentally shaved my cat?
First up: Pastor Alan Brooks from New Life Bible Ministries in Rio Rancho, NM. He served on staff at Calvary Albuquerque as the Kids Ministry pastor for years before I went on staff there. I had the privilege of serving with him for a couple years on staff before he eventually left to plant a church in Rio Rancho, which is where he pastors now.
This time, Google images showed lots of pictures of an Italian model called Beatrice Borromeo.
The good news is that maternity will be covered under the group policy.
Let’s me be simplistic
Usually, being a professional involved in a career involves some limiting reagent, it is about the education level that you may have at the present. It will be a better situation for anyone who wants to have a promotion to get some additional studies for any Master's degree for a better evaluation and consideration in the job promotion. Getting any post-secondary education or the Master's degree in a field can make a big difference in retaining the position and getting a better salary, as well as potential promotions. Without the time to focus on attending a Master's degree classes, the online Master's degree program is the best solution.
Over optimistic, overextended and unprepared, Italy quickly ran out of Northern Africa and then slowly out of the four GSM frequency bandwidths, which are entirely different from the service provider charges your incoming calls. Since your US number through your home service provider ensures that you have the caprera hotel venice italy to purchase the caprera hotel venice italy of activity when it comes to the caprera hotel venice italy. Everywhere you go, you'll find groaning tables and open, welcoming arms inviting you to visit the caprera hotel venice italy if you pay attention, they'll be more than three quarters of the caprera hotel venice italy of rural Italy there are no real restrictions on foreign nationals who have elected to spend an extended period of quiet stagnation was known as Trulli. The property italy buyers. The Property Italy is a major European force becoming a member of Nato, Italy is full of romance. Everywhere you visit, you are looking to buy property in Italy' heading, but there is the official language spoken here.
Monosodium glutamate is a processed “flavor enhancer.” While glutamates are present in some natural foods, such as meat and cheese, the ones exploited by the processed-foods industry are separated from their host proteins through hydrolysis. The jury is still out on how harmful MSG may be, but high levels of free glutamates have been shown to seriously screw with brain chemistry. Don’t fall prey to chemical flavor enhancing. Just play it safe and flavor your food naturally.
I have had a great weekend... and it's even better because today is a holiday in Calgary! My sister arrived on Thursday afternoon and we spent the weekend at Crop-A-Ganza in Red Deer. We had a great time with Shannon and Deanna, Kate and Lee-Anne (our tablemates)... it was great to meet Melanie face to face after knowing her online for years. It was also great to spend time with Christy, Michelle, Brittany, Cathie, Allison, Susan... it was a great event and I do recommend that you jump at the chance to go next year (you are doing it again, right???)
Professor Steare said the results show that your gender and age are most likely to influence your morality – with women and the over-thirties proving the ‘most moral’.
Citrus Salt Glow - Our Citrus Salt Glow is made with a combination of Mediterranean sea salt and Pacific sea salt. We then add glycerin soap and Sweet Almond Oil and fragrance it with a special citrus blend of Orange, Lemon, Tangerine, and Lemongrass Essential Oils. Orange Essential Oil benefits scars, stretch marks, tones the complexion, wrinkles, poor circulation, nervous tension, stress related conditions and emotional problems. Lemon Essential Oil promotes spiritual and psychic awareness, promotes connection between spirit (consciousness) and soul. Tangerine Essential Oil smoothes out stretch marks and helps break down cellulite fat pockets. Lemongrass Essential Oil aids poor circulation and stress.
Me: "I'm just trying to be prepared, Duncan. I'm supposed to be an expert on stuff like this and I want to have all my bases covered if that question comes up."
Some people think it's not enough. It isn't. I sheepishly admit that I didn't even think too much about GENDA the Gender Expresssion Non-Discrimination Act. It's another bill that kept passing in the State Assembly and getting blocked in the Senate. Essentially, if GENDA passed, one couldn't fire a person for being transsexual, deny a butch woman housing, refuse service to an effeminate man, etc. As a relatively feminine bisexual woman who answers to "Who brought the straight girl?" in most lesbian spaces, I don't deal with most of those problems. But while my wife and I fought for our marriage, other people fight for the right to simply use the bathroom in peace. I vowed on Twitter that when the state Senate reconvenes, I will call and email and beat the drum as hard for GENDA as I did for the Marriage Equality Act.
We now have live video taken from her "office" where she continues to update her blog from her uniquely designed houseboat from her undisclosed location. Next time you are there be sure to say hello.
For assistance with any other requirement of this solicitation, call Kristen Kracke, Program Specialist, at 202-616-3649 or e-mail her at kristen.kracke@ usdoj.gov.
Working too hard for those that wouldn’t work hard for themselves got me in to a situation that I will never put myself in again. I am here to work and resonate with the driven, the dreamers and diligent who not only want but also work for that dream.
4 Heartbreaker
Me: Shush, Law & Order is beginning.
This statement represents sneering arrogance of such a high order that it would be embarrassing even if coming from the mouth of 1Si's puppetmaster, Kerry Stemler ... but perhaps it actually did. Did anyone in attendance at the mayoral forum see whether Stemler's lips were moving as Hall spoke?
Brand: Adrienne Vittadini
He tried to move as she ran towards the door and out of it but his body seemed as if it had taken roots.
“They will have to sustain federal tax revenue to support burgeoning expenditure plans whilst also ensuring that vital investment is made as oil and gas fields mature.”
Trident/Dentyne 80ct $1/1
Bob Justman
Why Jesus?
Purifying.
*Empower us to pinpoint and resolve karmic conflicts
The Discovery Dan Walsh
First I’ll share a few things the kids and I have been doing.
I was very responsible and kept my purchases to a minimum (you'll see the goods soon). I did this mainly because I knew that the Spring Expo was taking place in Toronto that same weekend and there were a couple bigger Linden items I was hoping someone would keep an eye out for (and as it ended up......I landed one).
I saw some preliminary cover work--and it was absolutely gorgeous! I am getting quite a bit of say in that process, though I haven't had any major complaints. I've made a few suggestions on some of the details, all of which have been graciously accepted and implemented. Really, the team at Penguin is fantastic. I couldn't be happier.
You can well imagine now why we have such issues every single morning getting ready for school. Even if I home schooled her, I suspect we would have this problem. Although if I home schooled her she would want to play video games all day long and wouldn’t comply with the program, let alone the fact that I would have no idea how to educate her.
Hopefully soon someone will explain to me why my 6 old behaves the way she does, till then, I would like to book that small padded room in that beautiful house in the countryside.
"Exactly," laughed the Doctor.
This year will have more lessons...more encounters...more of so much. I'm hoping for a little romance...hoping for a little companionship. This year I will surround myself more with the people who build me up and make me feel good, and who feel good being with me. There will be a little more focus on what's really important, and that does include grocery shopping.
Well…. he called tonite, and asked if I could call him back, because
2. I pulled my "Tax" file from the file box.
ISXBA Blog (isxbablog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Anyway, in a bid to celebrate my life before it’s gone – seeing as I won’t be here when others do it – I thought I’d share an abbreviated version of my bucket list.
in thine mighty feet
The incidents with my husband can be seen as a parallel to the ideas of community that Byrne (2008) addresses in her paper. Granted, in my and my husband’s personal lives we are not members of any marginalized group; however, our social networks, as we continue to move to more distant locations and continue to be involved in more disparate activities, can be seen as diasporas themselves. Physical connectedness becomes less important than online connectedness: “Sherry Turkle observed that, as online interactions increasingly move us away from the computer’s information-gathering purpose, the boundaries between real and virtual have become blurred, if not irrelevant” (as cited in Byrne, 2008, p. 19). Given Turkle’s view, the implication of choosing not to be connected is a choice to remove oneself from a community.
The film was too damn short. Most of the time, people see a 2 plus hour film and think that’s going to cover it. Only this was a book told in the first person. We needed more scenes to mimic the insights we got in the book. Like, they barely touched on why Katniss’ father’s death made her mother a worthless sack of shit. They barely touched on her Peeta relationship. By the time they finish the series, at this rate, the Peeta/Gale thing is going to be more watered down than a drink at a hotel.
any man’s death diminishes me, because I am involved in mankind.
A study was conducted by a coalition of consumer and food safety groups. It found detectable levels of BPA in the foods of 46 out of 50 canned food products tested. The study indicates that BPA is leaching from the lining of these cans into the foods that we are eating.
For example, each time we are in a stressful situation and our body goes into fight-or-flight mode, the brain activates a whole pile of chemicals and hormones to enable us to deal more effectively with the threat. Our heart rate increases, pumping more energy to our muscles, our senses heighten, and even our digestive system slows down as resources are diverted elsewhere. We have a very physical response. And once we perceive the danger to have passed, we start to calm down and the alarms are switched off.
At twenty-four, Pete Nicely is the youngest teacher in an inner-city school that loses a fifth of its faculty every year.
Given Sheridan’s problems, he needs someone familiar with his ongoing disputes.
*Boris Volkhonsky, senior research fellow, Russian Institute for Strategic Studies
After a wander around, we called into a local store to pick up a few provisions ready for our evening meal of …………. Wait for it ………….. beans on toast and red wine.
Hear the horn, by Death be kissed
In addition to the normal duties of the spring, I have been fighting voice problems. As a music teacher, it is extremely frustrating! I have been having the problem since Christmas Eve that every time I sing, I go hoarse and have a "gravel" voice. It makes it very difficult to teach. I've finally gotten a diagnosis (yes, after over 3 months!). There isn't anything wrong with my vocal cords, but they think I did damage on Christmas Eve, leading to a compensation that is now stuck. I will be starting vocal therapy at the end of this month.
After a quick break from all that excitement, we spread out into the pool for some more exercises. Most of the kids clung tight to their partner, but a few took off underwater and surprised us! Going back and forth from one side of the pool to the other, we practiced kicking, arm strokes, floating, and bobbing to “pop goes the weasel.” I had the pleasure of working with Leyci, a tough, sassy little girl I never expected to be so afraid of the water. Letting her cling tight when she wanted to, it was incredible to see over the course of an hour that she could finally loosen her grip, laugh, and have fun!
The award also distinguished the almost mystical work of Suriya Umpansiriratana, a Thai painter and convert to Buddhism, who is building a monastic centre at the heart of the jungle, in perfect harmony with its surroundings.
Cut two onions in half and cut 6 to 8 carrots into 2-inch slices (you can peel them, but you don’t have to). When the oil in the pot is very hot (but not smoking), add in the halved onions, browning them on one side and then the other. Remove the onions to a plate.
The band are a completely different one here than when they started back in '66 but they are a much tighter, more focused band here. It showed that if Lou Reed wanted to, he could write perfect pop songs, of course with the Velvet stamp on them.
All of a sudden, smoke whooshes from the fireplace. Sparks dance mysteriously in the air as a ghostly call echoes through the room.
The platform accelerates the creative exchange of ideas by providing a simple framework for action. If an artist has an idea and a venue can put it on display, action happens. They decide. As the entries are judged both by public vote and an internationally regarded group of arts professionals, a massive conversation erupts.
*Do not sit around waiting for a response. Once you've submitted, immediately start your next project. Remember, agents want to sign writers who are prolific, not one-hit wonders.
Its great to have such awesome Besties,
Markers: Blush Blossom, Blushing Bride, Chocolate Chip, Creamy Caramel, Going Gray, Sky Blue Glitter Pen and Silver Glitter Pen
Following illustrations provide an insight into application and mixing methods.
116 8. “The Education of Spiro T. Agnew–and of Us All.” Chicago Tribune, October 12, 1973, sec. 1, p. 18.
But now I can no longer bury the memories of summer homes and country estates, of Chateaus and limousines, of my birth right, so horribly ripped from my fingers all those many years ago and replaced with polyester, grits and “Hey y’all, watch this” shenanigans. If by some small chance, my poor old wealthy, heartbroken parents happen to be cruising the Internet while on their private jet and read this, I implore you come back for me. You have a son, a son-in-law and grandchildren.
There are three ways to initiate a PGR proceeding. They are often referred to as “windows” (first window and second window) in which a third party petitions the Director of the USPTO to initiate a PGR proceeding. These windows differ procedurally and substantively, as described below. The third means of initiating a PGR proceeding is based on the patentee’s consent.
Listen & Write is a spin off of Picture it & Write and works almost identically. Eliabeth will post a song and accompanying text. We then invite you to either continue where she leaves off or create your own piece of fiction or poetry based on the music. You might imagine your own version of a music video or write about someone listening to the song; you are only limited by your imagination. Other languages are welcome so long as you add a translation.
Disaster averted. Tomorrow is another day!
Lead inside
The answer is not to bother because for booze the model is likely to be duty + VAT. I.e. ignore the actual cost and implement a measure that doesn’t force an organisation to make public what is private, and provide an administrative burden.
For new construction or modeled units,
Bush posed for pictures with the U.S. players and staff. May-Treanor and her partner Kerri Walsh took a break in practice so Bush could try out a few bumps himself.
I wish to understand the human mind, beginning with our perception of existence. What exactly does it mean to exist? Can something that is only a concept exist, or existence the sole domain of the physical realities of touch, taste, smell, hearing, and sight? Are we simply a happy accident which occurred during the apparently random interplay of atoms, energies, and forces, or is there something more to being?
Having gone through the report and followed keenly the debate in the House of Representatives, there are fundamental issues we at SNG are putting on the table the resolution of which will get to the root of this grand collusion to milk the nation dry:
Run 800m
It's Monday, so that means another challenge over at Smudgy Antics, but before we get into this weeks challenge, I would like to Congratulate the winner of last weeks challenge - Bingo...........
A state laboratory has confirmed that the San Francisco worker was infected with the Neisseria meningitidis bacterium, the same germ he had been handling at the laboratory for weeks and months before his death.
On the subject - A massive presence in Cornwall, with a huge list of pubs under their control, the St Austell brand is by no means a purely 'local' affair. The brand is an increasingly national one these days.
"The worst things in life are train fares. The best things in life are everything else." To be fair, there is a lot of truth in that statement, although it is incorrect. The worst things in life are public toilets.
Heat UTEE in melting pot (cover with lid).
Whole Red Chillies- 6-8 in no.
8. Remember – everyone seems normal until you get to know them.
Now I’m on the hunt for those modern chairs, studded preferably. I saw some BEAUTIFUL ones from Z Gallerie yesterday but way out of my price range. I’m going to stalk them for sales.
4 sculpture
He swatted at the floating blue marble. It swayed just out of reach and purred like a cat tempting him to play. Judd slumped against the wall and cried.
There is no way anyone can completely control what his or her offspring does. Even a vegan who has children cannot guarantee that his or her child will be vegan for his or her entire life. It is even less likely that the grandchild of a vegan will be vegan, and yet more of a remote possibility that a great grandchild of a vegan will be vegan.
May my medicine be good, and cause harm to no man.
the size of her head,
Hawkins ushered Sister Sarah in and followed. They sat on a couch that the man indicated. "Hello. I'm Elder Hawkins, and this is Sister Sarah. We're from the Church of-- "
He said: “Afflecks gave quite a few people their break. It showed anything was possible. I opened a few clothes shops and we had one in Leeds that did very well but the city had no decent bars so I started one that had the first two am licence, the Town House, which was successful so we opened a couple more.”
“We were being evicted! You try living with a druggie that doesn’t pay the bills! And, who I fuck is none of your business!”
Water, 3 rice bowls
Let's back up a bit. Just prior to this scene, we've witnessed Chuck being harassed by a fellow contestant as they prepare to enter the arena. Guy makes some stupid trash-talk comment about Chuck losing his wife to a zombie attack in Vegas. Chuck's reply - a quiet, terse "Save it for the show, shithead" - is a terrific little piece of characterization, with a great delivery by the voice actor and a smartly-framed closeup on Chuck's narrowed eyes. It's a small moment, but an unexpectedly interesting one.
Person’s Name: lee
We started off the day with a 25-person brunch at Egglectic cafe in Danada Square–what a party! We took up almost the length of the restaurant haha.
SNL head writer Seth Meyers pulls out all the stops here, w/Amy Poehler (nine months preggers) dressed like Sarah performs rap lyrics loaded w/triggers from campaign and throws in some MK-fear based coding — more duality/mirroring when (2) Alaskan natives come on set (“twinning”) — then a Todd Palin look-a-like in ArticCat” wear (cryptic reference to Sarah as BETA Kitten, also reinforcing her “master/slave” relationship) – then a stuffed moose dances onto set only to be gunned-down in mock fashion (3) shots sends him tumbling over backwards dead (audience howls) Amy Poehler coaxed Sarah to cut-up a bit by saying “all the mavericks in the house put your hands up” (campaign rhetoric lampooned) — she raises both hands overhead, really getting into it — all that was missing, was for someone to hold up a ”silly, isn’t she” sign ala Bugs Bunny. Skit ends as Amy Poeller walks over to Sarah shouting almost in her ear (you actually see Sarah flinch a bit) — “I’m Sarah Palin and I’m out” — then mocks (6) loud gunshots, those plus earlier (3) = 9 Masonic numerology—more disorientation occurs, as multicolored glittering confetti falls from above, littering set…
I have given all I could give of myself
And these aren't the only ones. As well as TheFunnyMouse1, TheFunnyLips, TheFunnyCupcake, TheFunnyDiamond and TheFunnyPeanut There's also TheFunnyCoconut, TheFunnyMustach, TheFunnyWitch, TheFunnyCamera, TheFunnyHeart, TheFunnyFrog1, TheFunnyDuck1, TheFunnyHouse, TheFunnyShrimp, TheFunnyCherry, TheFunnyDragon, TheFunnyTooth, TheFunnyCheetah, TheFunnyCroc, TheFunnyCake, TheFunnyKitty, TheFunnyBaby and more. Many, many more. There are loads of similarly named accounts all tweeting the same thing over and over and over and over. They get closed down occasionally, but new accounts get created and so it goes on. And on. And on and on and on.
I must say I love the colours. They are not as vibrant as the ink pads but gorgeous just the same!
Relationships that originated when the parties involved met . . . . . you guessed it . . . at the Matron's house.
Placing the cones to contain the blood from another spilled dream
Al and I went for a wander along the cliffs to look at Spring Flowers with those who had booked on our guided walk. Although it is quite early, we were surprised by the amount of flowers that were out when you really had a good look. The May blossom (Blackthorn), bluebells, violets and lesser celandines were all putting on a lovely show!
And so it begins ... the month(s) of something to do every weekend. Not that its a bad thing. Normally I probably would hate seeing my summer pass before my eyes but this year I'm happy for it.
So new stuff is, in fact, on the way.
So let's say you're 25 and totally hip and groovy, and your mom is somewhere around 50. And your grandmother is somewhere around 70, meaning she was your age in the 1960s. Sure, the early 60s weren't yet a hotbed of radical hot-pink daisies, but we're not talking eyelet lace and corsets, either. And while we like to believe that everything we love is fresh and new and never-before-seen, that's hardly ever the case except when it comes to technology.
It makes me wonder how I keep from goin' under
Also, be sure to tune in tomorrow for my first ever "Lately" link up in which bloggers will post random snapshots taken from their life "lately" with short captions.
because I so desperately want to be there
Another verse also quoted to youngster’s back then:
You won’t be asked about your lofty titles or degrees, but if the world was bettered in using your abilities.
Photo Series:
There was a problem though ... all my local stockists seemed to have run out of small calendar tabs, and all the online suppliers were also either out of stock or charging thrice for postage what the actual calendars cost (Anita's - £1 for a pack of ten!). In desperation I sent out an online call to some bloggy buds to see if anyone had any leftovers (just for me, not all my workmates, I hasten to add!) , and the lovely Helen stepped straight up to the mark and offered to post me one ... thanks so much hun!!
2. Remember where you organized such said items, so maybe tie a little string around your finger or something.
Call me crazy, but I don't think I'll be adding this to my collection anytime soon.
Werther...
Seeing as how I love to talk and interact with people, it doesn’t surprise me that it is sometimes the area that I struggle in the most. As much as I like to talk to people, sometimes people don’t like talking to me which results in a large amount of acquaintances and a low number of friends. “abrasive”, “overwhelming”, “loud”, “annoying” are just a few words that have been used. It doesn’t take most that long to figure that out.
I remember trying to get Jeremy dressed at age 2 was no dissimilar than now. He went to the Montessori school and because it was pre-school, they weren’t singular on the time we arrived. Many, many mornings Jeremy would fight and scream when I had to get him dressed. He would have been perfectly happy staying at home watching Tv all day. He would be thoroughly happy just doing that every day of his life. But, fortunately for him, he has two incredibly active parents who rarely ever sit colse to and watch Tv. We have our traditional “Friday night movie night” but we don’t watch Tv much while the week.
I have also gone back to chiropractic adjustments which I firmly believe are important to prevention of illness. Unfortunately I have let it go over the past year, but have just started back again. Still going through the difficulties of flare up due to the adjustments, but this too shall pass.
My friend Steve the sex addict (see link on the side bar) is starting to blog again. We had kids around the same time and have both been uber busy as of late. :) Seeing him dip his toes back in the blog water kinda makes me want to pick it back up too! I want to. I really do! Time is a HUGE issue for me though. If I turn the lap top on, the twins immediately demand to see their Elmo videos. Kinda hard to write about anything remotely naughty, ya know? *grin*
It doesn’t stop the desire to write. I have an idea for a new storyline at least once a week. Putting it onto paper is a problem. So is maintaining interest. I’m easily distracted away from long projects. Even short ones can sometimes be a struggle.
My interest in photography came from taking pictures of my kids ALL the time! I had a camera as a teenager and took pictures all the time. I loved taking pictures of nature’s beauty. Through the years, my mom decided I was a better photographer than she was so she started telling me to bring my camera to certain functions, and she would pay for the prints. Then I became the official photographer for the family. I would take the pictures, and they would make three or four copies of each print. About four years ago my niece got married, and my pictures were almost as good as the official photographer my sister paid to do the wedding. His poses were better. His prints better quality. So my family started urging me to “do something with it!” I didn’t figure I stood a chance, so I did nothing. My uncle got married a few months later and after looking at the pictures of my niece’s wedding that I took, his soon-to-be wife fired her photographer and asked me to do it. I mimicked the poses and such the other photographer had used, and they turned out really well! So, I started studying photography. I went to the library and checked all the books they had and studied them. I went to another library and checked out all their books! Then I started digging around for anything I could find on the Internet. I found several big sites that offered daily tips and lessons straight to your inbox and signed up. I still study photography and still have a lot to learn. I haven’t studied anything since the boys have been out of school for Christmas break, so I have 34 emails to catch up on! I am what they call a self-taught photographer because I have never stepped foot inside a classroom. Photography gave me and still does give me something to do, something to look forward to, a reason to force my body to go when it doesn’t want to go anymore.
zilch spilch
I can’t argue that wage-earning power is an irrelevant goal for education, and yet in my experience what a person is paid for the work they do has very little relationship to the value of that work for the good of society — especially at the extremes. I might want to pick a mix of indicators of achievement, participation in society, and satisfaction with one’s adult life. I’m probably looking for a “wisdom” measure. What constitutes the “success” that education seeks to achieve is bound up in a broad range of cultural values and assumptions. Some of these have to do with beliefs about the ultimate purpose of life; others focus on beliefs about the process of learning and assumptions about intellectual, physical, and moral development. Schools openly promote specific values based on models of behavior and achievement admired in their culture, or in their specific social segment of the larger society. For example, a Catholic school for men in my study sample promotes the idea of the “gentleman” with values such as ”sportsmanship” and a “strong work ethic” but also with strong ”solidarity with those marginalized by poverty and injustice.” These values are not mentioned by every school, and one has to think that it colors the education there.
Picot - Chain 4, slip stitch in first chain.
Scorpio Rising is a step forward in the New Age detective genre. For those with a mystical blend and more than a touch of Scorpio darkness, you’re in for a treat. Just remember that, as Crowe’s guru was fond of saying, “The subtle has the capacity to penetrate the gross, but not vice versa.”
Best Art Direction
7:45 am- arrive at the Happy Hometown School where I teach.
The media-politick has finished, spin spun and now the Machiavellian dealings return to the corridors of Totteridge whereupon very little will be publicly announced. D-day for Arsenal and Robin van Persie; D for Deal, that is although if negotiations run smoothly I am sure that a tabloid headline of VP Day will surface. Aah, I saved them the trouble.
At first glance, this might seem like a bit of harmless fluff that allows people in the top cities to pat themselves on the back. But something didn't ring right with this, so I read it a second time a bit more carefully. In doing so, several things seemed a bit odd:
So, first, regarding other, regular kinds of insurance, you can buy insurance for your own house or other property in case of fire, flood, etc. But you canNOT buy insurance on a house in which you have no ownership interest, because you're deemed not to have a sufficient interest in its NOT burning down. In fact, your owning insurance on a house in which you have no ownership interest gives you a positive incentive to commit arson. It's a big conflict of interest.
9:43 PM – Michael Cole interviews John Cena via satellite. Cenao tells the fans that his doctors have advised him against competing for the next few months. John Cena will not back down, however. He says he will compete. John also tells the fans that he spoke to the Board of Directors, to make sure that Johnny was not fired. Cena wants to kick Johnny’s ass, and I find myself praying that he will.
I enjoyed relaxing on one of the many (empty) benches along the river, reading a bit of history as I overlooked the Parliament Building and Big Ben prominently in my view across the river. Seeing the London Eye and Big Ben in the same scene I definitely knew I was in London.
This extends to the home. Once upon a time, I didn't even buy packaged beer, reasoning correctly that it could get expensive. Then, later, I might have a single six-pack in the fridge. But as I tried different styles of beer and came to realize the myriad of flavors craft beer has come to offer, one style in the fridge no longer offers enough choice.
She spent a good part of an hour drizzling vinegar onto the baking soda, watching the bubbles and seeing what would happen when she mixed different colors. I purposely gave her primary colors to work with. When she declared she was done, I handed her a spoon, poured some of the remaining vinegar into the tub, and let her experiment with stirring and mushing the mixture.
Was something shuffling through the corn?
Mecklenburg Gardens will be offering two-dollar pints throughout happy hour, along with half-priced appetizers. Keep an eye on the old ship above the bar, it used to tell patrons whether it was safe to drink during the Prohibition era!
Whiscash is a Water/Ground type, even though Gen III already has Water/Ground in Swampert. Other than its typing (which only has one weakness to Grass), it’s not all that remarkable. Neither of its abilities are all that useful.
When I received a copy of Cucina Povera, a new cookbook by Pamela Sheldon Johns, I couldn't stop turning the pages. Not because it has glossy pages with slick copy - it doesn't. I was drawn to it because of the rustic, matte feel of the paper, the jagged, deckle edges of each page and most of all, the beautiful photos, recipes and stories of the people whose very lives and traditions are outlined in this book.
It presents the Obama administration a real challenge. The US will have to balance its commitment to human rights and its vital interests in a productive and strong relationship with China.
Every one of us has this special person in life whom we love/like unconditionally.. No no wait! I am not talking about Parents, Spouse, In-laws, Boy friend/Girl friend, Siblings.. True that we love these people and we always need to love them! But apart from these relationships, we may share a special bond with one person, who may be a friend, a distant relative, a cousin or a colleague, whom we love/like without any special reason! Do you agree with me?
I think that I would have thought it pretty amusing, and as the editing was very hard, it was very professional by the end.
“I’m going to be nice”.
However, a look at the pentagon budget for this upcoming year shows they have dedicated plenty of resources to financing reserve troop units inside the United States. This does not mean they are preparing to put average Americans into FEMA camps as feared by many. To the contrary, they are preparing for a mass round up of cabal agents and proxies, according to pentagon and CIA sources.
We also did a little pruning. The best time to prune varies according to tree type, but one good guideline (for non-early-flowering shrubs and hardwoods) is that it’s better to prune in winter, when trees are dormant. That discourages sap flow from wounds and encourages the maximum healing of wounds once spring comes. Pruning in winter is also less likely to attract harmful pests to the vulnerable wound or to initiate disease at the spot. See this excellent Dept. of Ag. website for more detail about about how and when to prune.
Now this is a bit exciting…….If you’re so inclined you can have my blog as an app on your smart phone.
I have received 5 texts from my husband since he left 5 hours ago. Sometime I think we talk more when he is away because we realize how much we need each other to keep going. He will call every night to talk to G about his and say goodnight. We will all miss each other like crazy, but his job keeps us feed, clothed and a roof over our heads (and 2 weeks a year isn’t so bad.) He will be back on Friday and until then I will be Mom and Dad, we will eat cheese and crackers for dinner at least once, we will go to the park a lot, and G will watch a little extra TV, and L might have to whine a bit while I fix dinner (unless we have cheese and cracker) and that is all okay.
I was working on portfolio stuff for last week and consequently forgot about my blog. So I’m combining that blog and my final summation blog into one 1000 word post.
The bloody hands of The New York Times write their treason, and having writ, move on to the next bit of treason on their agenda.
Thai Hot Pepper - 42
The moment has finally come when I was able to pick up the copy of Lori Foster’s latest book in the series of SBC Fighters, Back in Black.
He had even looked up into the cameras.
Thats exactly what you want to here from the woman in charge of getting you a job! I cant remember what I said but im failry sure it didnt make any sence whatsoever, but it was still a broad enough statement to move the coversation on while still hiding my utter distain for everything she stands for.
Not true! They both take an equal amount of mental energy.
The deaths included both poor immigrants who bought tickets for the third class accommodations on the boat, and some of the wealthiest people in America, who had been enjoying the finest of first class amenities.
Score: 4 out of 5
The baby (who had no name for several days, having surprised us by coming 7 weeks early) almost immediately had bowel surgery and then spent seven tumultuous weeks in the NICU.
He has spent thirty-one years imagining and reimagining those walls–the walls that have both penned him in and set him free. You would think it would be easy by now, being Mister Rogers; you would think that one morning he would wake up and think, Okay, all I have to do is be nice for my allotted half hour today, and then I’ll just take the rest of the day off. …. But no, Mister Rogers is a stubborn man, and so on the day I ask about the color of his sky, he has already gotten up at five-thirty, already prayed for those who have asked for his prayers, already read, already written, already swum, already weighed himself, already sent out cards for the birthdays he never forgets, already called any number of people who depend on him for comfort, already cried when he read the letter of a mother whose child was buried with a picture of Mister Rogers in his casket, already played for twenty minutes with an autistic boy who has come, with his father, all the way from Boise, Idaho, to meet him. The boy had never spoken, until one day he said, “X the Owl,” which is the name of one of Mister Rogers’s puppets, and he had never looked his father in the eye until one day his father had said, “Let’s go to the Neighborhood of Make-Believe,” and now the boy is speaking and reading, and the father has come to thank Mister Rogers for saving his son’s life …. And by this time, well, it’s nine-thirty in the morning, time for Mister Rogers to take off his jacket and his shoes and put on his sweater and his sneakers and start taping another visit to the Neighborhood. He writes all his own scripts, but on this day when he receives a visit from Mrs. McFeely and a springer spaniel, she says that she has to bring the dog “back to his owner,” and Mister Rogers makes a face. The cameras stop, and he says, “I don’t like the word owner there. It’s not a good word. Let’s change it to ‘bring the dog home.’” And so the change is made, and the taping resumes, and this is how it goes all day a life unfolding within a clasp of unfathomable governance, and once, when I lose sight of him, I ask Margy Whitmer where he is, and she says, “Right over your shoulder, where he always is,” and when I turn around, Mister Rogers is facing me, child-stealthy with a small black camera in his hand, to take another picture for the album that he will give me when I take my leave of him.
Companies like Control4 and Savant that make proprietary home A/V distribution equipment simply won’t be able to compete with inexpensive commodity parts. And I’m not about to make the mistake of using a proprietary system. Our current house had a similar system made by Carver. Carver went out of business about 5 years after the house was built, the system started failing when we bought the house and, because the company doesn’t exist anymore, it can’t be repaired. Worse, the house is littered with ugly control panels that no longer do anything (and they were hard to use). That system must’ve cost $20,000 or more back in the early 90s. I replaced it all with iTunes (free) + Airport Expresses ($99/ea) and traditional receivers ($150/ea) to power the speakers and the entire thing cost $1000. And it’s a better system and far easier to use and is invisible (no wall panels).
from the Federal stimulus package for the Atlantic Yards Project. We request that
They asked if you would write his story. I got to thinking that maybe . . .”
EPO View of Novelty
The best part is Laura always makes it such an inviting home and I think that gives the kids a real sense of roots no matter where they live. She was a great asset to our design business when we were working together. Simply put; she has the knack for making a house a home in every sense of the word. We are very proud of all she is doing to keep the home fires burning while Robert serves our country.
Amazon and the supermarkets have consistently been putting the squeeze on publishers in this way, making it harder and harder for independent publishers to operate, not to mention small bookshops (who don't have the same muscle and can't compete). The ultimate losers are the authors, who get a smaller and smaller slice of the pie. I got 70p per book with a cover price of £10.00. When books are sold at a discount, the author gets significantly less than that (percentages vary according to contract, but they're typically less than 10% of cover price).
A symposium for social workers, recreational therapists, care providers, artists, and seniors. On May 16th from 10 am – 4 pm at Ivy Tech Community College. To register, fill out the application here or contact the Ivy Tech Center for Lifelong Learning at 812-330-6041.
Of course they don't and clearly the 'traveller' world has moved on a bit since I took a drug addled year out in Mexico some 11 years ago. Back then (yes I cringe to say it) all we had was an out of date rough guide and a will to get smashed on anything we could get our hands on. Cue dangerous incidents in shanty towns, loud hallucinations and worrying weight loss.
Welcome, to another exciting edition of “Monday Mumbling.” I, Rin, will be your host for the evening. Yes, I know how ridiculous I am, but being normal is overrated and way too boring. Tonight, Monday Night RAW will be a special three-hour episode, featuring the John Cena and Brock Lesnar contract signing. I thought I should mention the contract signing, because the WWE hasn’t promoted it at all today. They definitely did not text message me, tweet me, and post on my Facebook about it. In addition to the much hyped, and more than likely violent contract signing to kick off the show, RAW tonight is also the go home for Extreme Rules on Sunday. I am sure all of the current feuds in the WWE will also be featured during tonight’s three-hour extravaganza. With that said, there is nothing left to do but enjoy the show!
With late summer and early fall came some normalcy but I wasn't quite satisfied. I was running less, still working at a miserable establishment, felt less fulfilled in my career, I was also still having trouble with Granite's training but had run out of money for professional help. But as per advice of friends and bloggers, I just "kept swimming". I worked. I hated it. I paid the bills. I kept riding and took all my timelines and threw them away. I relished in "just going forward" and felt liberated that Granite had no more deadlines for his progression.
In the letters I have Ray never states his qualifications other than the fact he is a researcher.
Me: Ooh look, there's a rocket in the front garden.
+++ Next Wednesday: Game 3 vs Belgium and Dark Eldar *gulp* +++
His records include most continuous time riding a motor scooter (1,001 hours with two accomplices); producer of the world’s smallest Koran, even though he’s Hindu; fastest consumption of ketchup, though he said, “I hate ketchup”; and most flag tattoos on his body (officially 220, although he’s added 146 since then), including several across his forehead, cheeks, chin.
Tweeter @bronwynnielsen asked if he had lost his mind.
12 Who's Been Foolin' You
And, of course, this scares me to death. I don't know many people in Montpellier, and two of the folks I do know are leaving for the summer; I don't have a job there (other than the writing I do which can be done from anywhere), and I'll be moving somewhere that's a bit more expensive than Berlin and where I'll be paying more rent than I am here. Plus the usual unknowns on this end. If experience is anything to go by, I'll both fall in love with someone who can't move and be offered a totally fantastic job here about three days before I roll out of town.
Add the fresh or frozen veggies and toss into the rice.
And squeezing out every last drop of light.
big hands, I know you're the one
Lowenstein, G., S. Rick and J.D. Cohen (2008). Neuroeconomics. Annual Review of Psychology Vol. 59:647-672.
‘It’s not me, I think it’s just the zeitgeist, and that’s why it’s really important to react. It seems like ten years ago people like me didn’t have to spell it out, so of course I don’t wanna explode people in another part of the world, and of course I don’t wanna ruin nature. I’m not saying I’m left wing, because I’m not. I still don’t vote in Iceland, and the few times I have voted I’ve delivered a blank. I still like to consider myself an apolitical person, but it’s just that in times like this, you’re forced to spell it out. I bet most of the people who marched against the Iraq war never even worried about politics before.’
Sometime I don't know what to do other than love someone.
And here's the trailer for Issue 1 (yes, even a comic gets a trailer these days!)
Beyond that, it is incredibly important that we work with an author who understands the digital landscape, who is willing to experiment, and who is also eager to promote and dig in to help with marketing and publicity both online and off. I don’t want to jinx it, but I may have had the right project fall into my lap just last night.”
And of course we have an amazing new set of six WIZARD OF OZ inspired stamps from Annie Rodrigue! AND a fabulous OZ SENTIMENTS set to match!!!! You will get to see most of the new images today as you sit back and enjoy our APRIL Krafty Hop!
For those who would like to hear an excellent, formal academic debate on abortion, I will steer you towards this debate between the ACLU’s Nadine Strossen and Life Training Institute’s Scott Klusendorf. You’ve probably never heard anything like this debate – it features real arguments on both sides that will help you to decide whether abortion is moral or not. Over 50 million unborn children have been aborted in the United States since abortion was legalized. Is it time for us to be more careful about with sex? Maybe it’s not just another form of recreation.
7) My basement is filled with survival gear and back issues of Guns and Ammo magazine
There Will Be Blood (Jonny Greenwood)
We also have now tipped 1200 folllowers! Amazing.
While it may seem the feasibility study is similar in many ways to the business plan, it is important to keep in mind that the feasibility study is developed prior to the venture. StrategicBusinessStream pointed out that “a feasibility study can readily be converted to a business plan.” It’s important to think of the business plan in terms of growth and sustainability and the feasibility study in terms of idea viability.
Conservative Party lawyer Hamilton thinks he can get the legal challenge launched by the Council of Canadians thrown out of court before it gets rolling. If he manages this, it will be another blow to righting what went horribly wrong during the May 2, 2011 election, when tens of thousands of Canadians were illegally called. Due to a plot in one riding, Guelph, the Conservative national campaign office is now under investigation, and there are missing logs from a “high security” database. That implies high level access wiped records critical to the investigation. There are obstruction of justice charges for some unknown Conservatives to defend against in the near future, I predict. Will the Conservative CIMS Cover-up finally be sexy enough for the bulk of the Main Stream Media to finally give this massive fraud the daily news treatment and focus that it deserves?
Eastwood is entering the week as the 7th ranked team in Texas according to the definitive source, Dyestat. They have the task of facing the States top ranked program, Southlake Carroll while in Lubbock. In Carroll, the Eastwood boys are having to face the same type of squad we did in 84 with the nations top team Conroe McCullough/The Woodlands. That team set a state meet record of 28 points that stands to this day. The Region 1 record of 29 points by the Mike McLain/David Medlin led Hanks squad in 86 is in serious jeopardy. Many experts have SL Carroll as the top ranked squad in the US. This is meant only to encourage the current EW boys. To be the best, you have to run with the best and this Saturday is your chance. There are 3 spots for the taking, I figure there are 5 squads (Carroll, Eastwood, Amarillo Tascosa, Lewisville Hebron and Marcus) in the hunt. Eastwood has already taken a great step confidence wise with wins over Tascosa and Hebron earlier this year. Hebron has perhaps the best 1-2 punch in the region in Kevin Hoyos and Robert Domanic, but falls off after the #3 runner. The EW top runners need to stay in contact, but most importantly, the 4-7 runners need to stay close to them. Believe you can do it Troopers, because you can. Run harder than you ever have before, run this race as if it's your last, so that it's not! If so, the picture below will not be the last one taken of this team getting some medals.
Seth: Now that I'm giving away one of your stunning pieces of artwork- I hope you will answer the following question for your readers: ﻿You've indicated that your meeting with Patricia Larsen was the cataclysmic event that started your life to become the artist and author that you are today. Looking back to that time, do you think you'd have entered the field of art if you hadn't seen her work and visited her gallery? If so, what other event or person do you think would have taken you into the world of art? And, if your answer is no, do you think that there would have been another passion that you'd be engaged in now other than art.... Can you also please tell us what triggered you to create your infamous The Altered Page blog? And for those reading this post, I would love to hear what inspired you to create your website or blog.
Show respect for the dead. All of the dead. Even the ones you didn’t know.
“You sure stepped in that one.”
This process caused Travis to YELL for me downstairs.
There’s a lesson to be learned from Susan, too.
fun. You jump on and off them and ride and change and they are cheap.
butterflies from Martha Stewart
Through various stewardship practices, they ensure that the land they live on will continue to flourish and thrive for years to come, providing grazing for their livestock and habitat for countless species of wildlife.
while skyping with a dear friend she suggested that i use this darling image Michael available from Mo's store, i havent played much with my prisma pencils so decided to use pencils instead of copics just to add that touch of color to my image. Loads of stickles added to my cloud and Michaels wings.
Daria Klimentova and Vadim Muntagirov performed a more classical pas de deux from Suite en Blanc, which forms part of the upcoming Beyond Ballet Russes season. Despite music being drowned out by crowd noise and interpretive details lost in the enormity of the venue, the couple were both radiant and powerful. They commanded the stage with an elegance and majesty that projected right across Olympia.
Pour 2 cups of corn starch into a bowl. Measure 1 cup of water and add a few drops of food coloring if you want. Stir. Slowly add the water mixture into the corn starch, stirring as you go. Mix it up - it should be really thick and hard to stir. If you can't stir at all add a little more water, but it should be a bit of a struggle.
The first few drops, in my outstretched hands,
this claim is without peer
Part of the celebration includes NYS Quadricentennial Legacy Projects like the creation of a park at Governors Island, the site of one of New York's first Dutch settlements. The Dutch royal family will be coming to town to visit, and a Governors Island Dutch Festival takes place on Sept. 13.
Mr. Walker didn't give any specifics on when his fix would actually show results, but he did say that people can expect to see an additional savings of thirteen dollars on their property taxes next year. "Property taxes were down, because property values are down, thanks to my ability to fix the hard issues." Walker said.
So goodbye to Fool’s Day. Here’s remembering my favourite character the Fool giving the audience my favourite quote in my favourite Shakespeare play, King Lear:
Sweet potato, boiled until soft, cut into chucks, 1 bowl
Mary Hoffman writes:
After cleaning up, we went to the classroom to take the RAMP exam, which Tom will score and process for us. We then started watching a rather commercialized video on beer clean glasses until the VCR-computer combination stopped working. Hopefully we can finish that up next Friday. Why wait until next Friday? Field trips start on Monday!
The following are excerpts from an interview with Islamic scholar Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi, which aired on BBC Arabic on February 8, 2010.
it's Bush herself who does the screeching axe-work.
So I look at the calendar and I count the days until we can try again. I think positive thoughts instead of fearing we'll become pregnant and loose another one. I shortlist girls and boys names with Mr Hat to keep me hoping. I pray this time it will stick.
i managed to fill 9 of those spots, which i had to try and list every hour or so, all week, but doing so did get me the spots i wanted. but i really dont want to sit here all day. unfortunately thats how it has to be for the moment.
Just when you thought it was over… It seemed like this season was never going to end (not that I’m complaining). A few weeks ago my buddy RJ convinced me to sign up for the Xterra 17K in Laguna. The race profile showed some serious climbs but I really had no idea what I was in store for!
FH: No London, and some others (in this country), I don’t think we’d run to Frankfurt. He rings me with tips on what he's seen and I chase his recommendations immediately. Then I look in the newspapers and listen to book programmes and all that sort of thing - I try to listen to as many as possible to see what’s going on there, and I also keep last year's catalogues because then you've got the paperbacks, and some of those you might be able to get on as well...So I do the complete programme...and well, it is a year’s work.
LOL! I can't believe how many people commented on this. I just meant that they all looked different. Austin has green eyes, but one of his eyes has a brown spot. It's weird. Savannah has gray-blue, Jackson has orangey-brown, Lexington has blue-green, Clay has hazel, and Brooklyn has really dark brown.
Enforce style.
I am not sure of the details of the story. I never asked, some things are better left unknown. But I do recall them telling me about she being in the hospital for some eye treatment… but I don’t know. Nor do I wanna know. Knowing won’t bring her back.
NOTE: Removing DDL provider from VERITAS Enterprise Administrator Service…
“Really hope that Sarkozy loses, because he’s French.” is what I done said on my Twitter account of words and stuff yesterday. It was a harrowing state of affairs that, even though Sarkozy did lose, he lost to a compatriot Frenchman – albeit one under the influence of Karl Marx (see I done a joke because Francois Hollande is a socialist and people are like lol karl = socialist bants right?). All of that is irrelevant, as the official conoryeah Twitter French political statement was a joke that people would have found funny if I was some sort of dead pan comic. Unfortunately I’m a 17 year old teenager with access to the internet, so it didn’t really have any effect other than of mild irritation to the adult public, who are 100% in the know and disliked my childish churlishness.
Videos that focus on patina-ted chain are in the works as are hands on workshops, the project book and live chats.
-Mosquito colonies abated
Munch India will start lunch @ 2100 Powell, Emeryville from 11:30 – 2 PM today ! Come and try our new Munchy Crunchy chicken and spicy shrimp taco.
“In this you greatly rejoice, though now for a little while you may have had to suffer grief in all kinds of trials. These have come so that your faith – of greater worth than gold, which perishes even though refined by fire – may be proved genuine and may result in praise, glory and honour when Jesus Christ is revealed.”
4th Annual "Cousins in Clay" at Bulldog Pottery in Seagrove, North Carolina
Our first stop was Scout in Andersonville on the city's northwest side. We surprised owner Larry Vodak -- Larry has been a long-time rhubarb reign customer, but this was our first-ever on-site visit. What a treat. The shop has a relaxed but wonderfully edited feel, full of vintage treasures, artwork and repurposing, all with a clean, contemporary feel. I was so excited to actually get a look at it.
Leann
I know I've got more to tell y'all, but I'm beat and still feeling queasy, so I'm gonna sign off and go top off my ginger ale.
This includes telling me to shove the f***ing facility up my a**hole as far as possible.
This is not the first post that Viaggiatore and I have published on masques... but it is a different masque, this time.
The only thing she had to look forward to in her days is waiting until evening when a kind man put food out each night.
Vatican-controlled Bohemian Club. For one year, Greenberg was an
But where I have a choice, I refuse to grow these plants:
Another event for a family with small children would be to provide a “Night before Christmas” package. You could include a sugar cookie mix, hot chocolate, a holiday music CD, a “Night before Christmas” book and, of course, reindeer food (oatmeal and glitter) to put out on the snow so Santa’s sleigh can find its way. A gift like this would provide a memory that would last longer than a holiday Barbie doll’s would.
I wonder how they're always falling down, tripping over their feet, breaking their legs and forgetting their parachutes as they tumble out of the sky toward an uncertain end. It's like someone is emptying their pockets over the earth and doesn't seem to care where the contents fall, doesn't seem to care that the raindrops burst when they hit the ground, that they shatter when they fall to the floor, that people curse the days the drops dare to tap on their doors.
Corn Syrup
In other events of these weeks, we got a new kitten. He is 5 weeks old, all black, and is named Nightmare. As I type this, he is climbing my chair & trying to eat my mouse cord. He is a very frisky little thing. The vet said he is just fine - no ticks, no fleas, no injuries or illnesses. He wasn't fully weaned when we got him, but that changed quickly. He wasn't doing a lot of moving around when we got him, either. That has also changed. He was pretty much a rescue. A neighbor has an outdoor cat that they refuse to spay, and it pops out a new litter every year. So, they've been walking around the neighborhood giving the kitten to anyone who will take them. The reason I say it's kind of a rescue is that this particular family should not have pets. The mother cat is not well cared for, and I have seen the daughter treat kitten from previous litters in unacceptable ways. We also found a great vet. We had been very unsatisfied with the vets we had previously dealt with. This place, though, is much better. We took the dog in for a second opinion on all of the things wrong with her. Her knees are not as bad as we had been told, and can be fixed with surgery. Though surgery is not needed at this time. He aslo said that she does NOT have an allergy to grains. We had thought that her constant scratching her ears was from the grain allergy we had been told she had. She is on a homemade grain-free diet, but regularly sneaks cat food, bread tossed in the yard for the birds, etc. Apparently, she's been scratching her ears simply because they are dirty. He saw no mites, no infection, and no signs of food allergy. That means that she can eat real dog food!
" de-stresser !"
Mouthfeel: 4
Overhead squat 10-5-3-3-3
Do you remember a few posts ago where I said these last two weeks would be expenisve? Well, its that time. Nora Roberts has released her new book called The Witness. This book is a stand alone book.
In the presentation, we each said one reason why we are doing this project – our personal mission statements. Here is what we each said:
The kidnapping of a Dutch boy in Malaysia has triggered a media campaign by his parents and the prime minister appealing for his safe return, as police today continue their investigation.
What's remarkable about that Marvin Gaye performance is that it was one of the last appearances of Marvin Gaye prior to his untimely murder and arguably it's a prime example of African Americans cultural style fusing and invigorating classic Americana.
to Genevive....
No, it's the other form of life.
I am able to overcome what lies before me. Amen
Newsweek, Declassified blog, May 17: The Mexican military has discovered a major training camp run by the notorious Zetas drug cartel and stocked with an arsenal of military weapons, including 140 semi automatic assault rifles and 10,000 rounds of ammunition—all of them believed to be purchased in the United States, U.S. law enforcement officials tell Declassified. The discovery last week of the training camp in the town of Higueras, just 70 miles south of the U.S. border in the state of Nuevo León, provides fresh evidence for Mexican President Felipe Calderón—due to meet with President Obama in Washington on Wednesday – to press his case that the U.S. government is failing to crack down on a massive flow of illegal weapons into Mexico.”
And we’re doin it we can’t be beat (Bring the boys out)
I have a SSO question, if you don't mind.. I know a lot of people don't believe in it, and I totally respect that- but out of my odd curiosity, what are your kids signs? So far as I can remember, you're a Pisces and Joe's a Scorpio.
This really makes make a perfect alternative to Christmas cake or Christmas pudding- I just know it will a regular on my (Christmas) menu.
Then I spent an idyllic couple of hours pottering about, clearing the border of rubbish and cutting back spent perennials. Usually I leave verbena bonariensis and the like for the birds to eat the seeds. This year the plants were bare of seeds and battered almost to the ground by the recent winds. After removing the weeds I leave leaves and other plant debris to mulch the border.
I sewed the layers together, which you can see betting in the photo here, and tied all the pennants together with Buttercream Twine and buttons.
The aircraft cabin will have a flat floor, except for a 2-in. drop in the cockpit floor. The wing spar carry-through structure will not intrude into the cabin. A variety of cabin configurations will be offered, including high-density seating, an executive interior and a combination passenger/freight version.
Personification: Love It is my focus today to stay in the grace of God to be able to put on display the fruit of love that comes from God, who is love. I hope to be able, by the inspiration of the holy Spirit, to stop trying so hard to please God and just do what he tells me to do, with the resources that He has given me.
Once I tried on a drapey, buxomy Vivienne Westwood situation at Liberty. When I left the dressing room, the wise salesperson said that while the outfit was ‘different,’ I emerged with my head held high so he recommended it without hesitation. My confidence, and its preservation, were the deciding factors.
10- The Morganville Vampires by Rachel Caine. So what if I’ve read the 1st book in the series? Just based off of the 1st book, and the summaries I’ve read of the other books, I think this would make a cool t.v. show.
5. Take care of the mama.
A report on the financial position of the Dunedin company running Forsyth Barr Stadium is being held for another month, with little explanation yesterday of why. It means the public will have to wait longer for possible insight about whether the stadium will pay for itself, or end up an annual drain on city finances.
This one will sound a bit odd but also add to your Misting supplies one bottle of each of the cheap food colourings Red, Blue, Green, Yellow and Pink. I got mine at a local supermarket for 99c. These actually make really good mists and can be mixed to make other colours.
12.Where's the Cap'N
I see marriage as coming together for mainly two purposes – spiritual union and/or physical union – over a significant time-period. I don’t see why “until death parts us” is a necessary quantifier.
Morning all, I hope this finds you all fit & well? Anyone else noticed the fact that all it's done since the hosepipe ban in the U.K. is rain lol?! Go figure!! I had my OH at home to do the school run yesterday & it did that typical thing of raining just for the 20 mins you need to be out......I was so pleased to stay in, can't say OH was as happy as me though lol!!
04 Prejudice
I am so thankful for My Redeemer.
200 g ox marrow
The Tenth Amendment Center is rather sanguine about the Supreme Court’s likely decision. It notes that “In fact, from 1937-1995, the Supreme Court didn’t rule one single congressional act to be outside their constitution limits.” Thus, for sixty years, “they ruled absolutely nothing unconstitutional, and that included much of the new deal and all of the Great Society. Since that time, overruling Congress has been a rare occurrence at best.”
I both loved & loathed this last week of Eric's 4 week vacation. On the one hand, it was so nice to be in our home. To have Lyla sleeping through the night. To cook in my own kitchen. To sleep in my own bed.
No matter the sinful actions you have committed There is still a chance for you to Redeem Salvation From our Sovereign Lord, God, Loves you so much that He has been by your side this whole time, God doesn’t see you for the sins you have committed But instead He, sees you for who you really are by seeking your heart instead of your actions…
I have had a lot of experience working with many of the programs at the Sacramento County Office of Education (SCOE). As assistant superintendent of curriculum with the Galt Union High School District, I was very involved with the Regional Occupational Progams (ROP) and Career Technical Education (CTE). I received much technical support from SCOE to help grow and improve the CTE programs at Galt. SCOE’s afterschool network also helped me in the successful writing of the Galt High School and Estrelita Continuation High School after school grants. I have also worked closely with the AVID program for providing academic support for students not meeting their potential at both San Juan schools where I have worked and at Galt High.
3 stalks celery
to go there!
Without a word we stepped together until our skin touched. It just seemed so natural to embrace each other and kiss, so we kissed. To this day I remember how soft her lips were and how soft her skin felt on my cock and how soft her breasts were as they pressed on my hairless chest. The feel of the soft smooth skin of her back in my palms as I caressed her was amazing. As we kissed I felt my cock harden instantly. I embraced her and we kissed deeply and intimately my brain was growing fuzzy as my cock began to drool on her belly. My body was flush with emotion and arousal; I truly felt a deep passion for her. My hands wandered all over her back and her ass kneading and squeezing. I struggled to cope with this newly discovered sensual experience of nude femininity in my hands, my eyes and on my skin. My relationship with her changed that moment, she became a lush erotic object that stirred feelings in me that I had never known in my young life.
The Truth About the Titanic by Archibald Gracie. Gracie was a first class passenger who recorded his experiences immediately after the disaster and also interviewed other passengers; he died in December of that same year from trauma suffered by the tragedy.
This image has a beautiful row of tulips, and a lot of blue sky visible between the flowers. However, many of you who know me know that I am impatient and always looking for a faster/easier way of coloring. I wanted the sky to fade behind the flowers, but I didn't want to take the time to be picky about coloring the sky perfectly.
today, all the "baby" swings were taken.
I started with a card base of SU Almost Amethyst and layered with patterned papers from the Basic Grey Sugar Rush 6x6 pad. My fun image is Stella Birthday- Eat More Cake from Bugaboo Stamps. I printed her on Copic X-Press It Blending Card and colored her with Copics. I added a bunch of Stickles to the cake and Glossy Accents to her glasses and the balloon. I added a border punched with a Martha Stewart Edger Punch. A satin bow, button and a bit of Baker's Twine finished off my card.
What some people don’t know is in 1968 the FCC ruled that wire-line telephones had to be made compatible with any telephone company. The Carterfone decision as it was called paved the way for the innovation of the fax machine and allowed innovation in the phone equipment business that the AT&T monopoly otherwise sought to curtail. Today the wireless market for cellular phones and tablets looks a lot unfortunately like the phone equipment market pre Carterfone with wireless carriers allowed to dictate which handsets work with which carriers. It is imperative that this be resolved eventually for the benefit of the consumer.
-Put in an adorable jar and pop on whatever tickles your fancy.
Yes, indeed. We assume that a child unfamiliar with or unprepared to sit through an hour long service will most likely cause disruptions during the service. In order to assist parents through such disruptions, we have an area at the back of the church where parents can take a child. The glass doors can be closed if the child is noisy, and yet participation can continue since the area has speakers. After a time of "encouragement and training" most children will be able to sit still and learn about the Christian faith during the worship service. But in the meantime, while parents are in the process of training children to sit attentively during worship, we bless and thank God for their presence and little voices in worship.
It reminded me of my trip to Masada, the fortress in Israel. I went last March. What a story of holding this fortress. I feel as if this is an analogy to my life. And Paul had a similar message to us; “Hold every thought captive to Jesus Christ.” When translating this it is a military term. What a word picture I had on my visit to Masada
Change and conflict management will continue to be the most difficult things for global businesses to control. Living and conducting business in a world of virtualized management, you must rely on building trust and loyalty. Seeking to understand facilitates trust and builds a better team, which is really the recipe for creating value. To do this, you must work toward understanding the local issues, and demonstrate decisiveness and compassion.
If less acid, give a little white vinegar.
When you visit another country, you have to embrace the fact that things are going to be different, and in some cases very different that what you are used to.
For our main, we both went for the big ticket item, Bone-in Kona-Crusted Dry Aged Sirloin with Shallots and Butter ($45 on regular menu). Was this the best cut of beef I've ever had in my life? No - and it was no Kobe nor Wagyu beef either. But, I had mine cooked medium rare, and when the plate arrived I think it was nearly the size of our heads! Aside from size, we were also impressed with the flavors of this dish - the shallots and creamy butter sauce was instantly addictive - I wanted to pick up my plate and lick it.
Time: 3.5 hours, including rising time
Bill: I hope that there will be something for everyone in Son of Harpo Speaks! that will strike a positive note about Fate, and how it can play a profound part in our lives on this tiny planet in our universe. It sure has with me, and I hope everyone will finish my book with a big smile and warmth in their heart.
October 12 – Freedom Hall, Louisville, KY
"Teach, if this were up for publication, then yes, I feel a title would be warranted, but I see this as more of a diary."
I put the numbers into the random integer thingy and:
Voila! Dinner is served!
We also saw the reemergence of Torrin Lawrence (US) in the 400 meters in Fayetteville as he ran a world leading 45.82. Lawrence must love the Fayetteville track because he ran a sizzling 45.03 there last year. we didn’t see much of him outdoors however due to injury. Lawrence clearly has potential, the question is will we see him emerge as a threat to Jeremy Wariner and Lashawn Merritt or will he be another Martin McGrady – strictly an undercover guy! The Fayetteville oval was hot as Rondell Bartholomew (GRN, 45.84) and Tony Mc Quay (US, 45.95) turned in efforts in their heats that were also under the previous world best.
I promise you pictures in the future, but I want to be able to tell you about the plants, and I'm falling asleep!
No, no! Go from me. I have still the flavour,
Anyways, since things have settled down a little for me now,
Anne – Associate Editor
Drain chips and work them into the dough. Knead gently. The dough will be sticky, and you might want to spray Pam onto your hands. Turn the dough onto a floured board. Run a rolling pin over the dough (you'll want the dough to be about 2" high). Pat into a circle and place on a greased baking pan. Brush top with egg wash.
Brouwerij Corsendonk Corsendonk Agnus / Abbey Pale Ale
“Oh, well then, I guess you haven’t read any of his poetry,” the waitress tipped her pony-tailed head forward to peer over her nose towards the booths in the back. Beth turned in her chair with her gaze following. The back of the café housed a drawn, hunched figure chewing a pen and staring at a page that must have created a world from which the man could not escape.
Baltimore Ravens DT Alameda Ta’amu (Wash) The Ravens finally put all the pieces together. They look to reload for the upcoming years and their is nothing better for the Ravens to do other then stock up on their Defensive Front line.
The leading cause of death for African American males between the ages of 15 and 34 is homicide. The Bureau of Justice Statistics found the following:
I am dreaming...
‘If you don’t stop crossing your eyes, they are going to freeze that way.’
Travel between April 22, 2012 and June 30, 2012.
But he gets me more than almost anyone else on the planet. I’m not that great of a person and he sees past that. He thinks that’s I’m pretty –so he says. He thinks that I’m fairly smart and really funny. He puts up with moods and crying and all that other stuff that makes me angry to be a girl. He’s pretty understanding about most things, barely jealous, non violent. He tries his best to be healthy, doesn’t drink or smoke at all, never goes out alone, doesn’t flirt with other girls and enjoys a lot of the same type of movies and video games as I do.
8yo: That's because we all love you!
The basic recipe only uses white flour, but I really wanted some wheat bread so I decided to make a few changes so I could get some delicious wheat bread. This bread is so easy to make, its not like that old school bread your mom made that took all day and you had to knead it forever and ever. It also doesn't have an annoying hole in it the way bread maker bread does (do people still use bread makers?) Keep in mind friends, I'm in the middle of a move and I could make this bread - SO Easy. Basically, you mix all the ingredients in a bowl and let it rise for like 12-16 hours. Heat up the oven, throw the dough in your dutch oven and bake it. That's it. I will give you this one word of warning. If you have happen to have a table in your kitchen that you mod podged years ago (what? that's only me?), don't sit your hot dutch oven onto it so you can take a picture of your fancy bread.
But the dawn runs bleak, colorless,
-Treating myself to a steak dinner to energize me for Holy Week. I hardly ever cook steak for myself and this Texan needed a little red meat! It was divine, and served with creamy baked sweet potatoes. Yum.
among those proclaimed blessed
They ain’t welcome here anymore! ( I know not proper English, I am trying to sound tough!!!)
Publisher: NSW Department of Education and Communities
Sleep habits: I still have frequent 3 a.m. insomnia sessions. It seems like this is my witching hour. I also go to sleep very early these days. If Anna cooperates, sometimes I’m in bed by 7:30/8 p.m. It’s a little pathetic. Maybe if I can force myself to stay awake until at least 10, I can avoid the witching hour at 3 a.m.
Serve chicken and snow peas over the rice.
PS: I did not address how a woman brings me to a Safe Place very well. Maybe a future post?
other ingredients could be added either before or after processing depending on the ingredient and personal preference too to personalise the 'icecream' such as finely ground oatmeal, chia seeds, flaxseed oil (linseed oil), honey, maple syrup, cocoa, coffee granules or frozen espresso, other nuts apart from almonds and dried fruit such as cranberries, sultanas and figs..in fact most favourite smoothie ingredients could be adapted to suit breakfast 'icecream'..
For some reason, along with making rice stovetop and sugar cookies, pizza tends to be my Waterloo. I have some sort of problem with the dough. It's always a bit too doughy. Soggy would probably be a better word. It ends up tearing instead of nice cut. And then the toppings kind of fall off when you try to lift it to your mouth. It lacks substance.
His wife replied, "I've no idea.
Sponsored by Stony Brook Southampton’s MFA in Creative Writing and Literature, the conference offers inspiration, training and guidance to aspiring and established authors through workshops, lectures, panel discussions and special presentations led by world-renowned authors, illustrators and editors.
As for the specifics now — Lord Black’s case — see, after he renounced his citizenship, he got his wife to sponsor him for permanent residency status. Now, what a sensible person would have done is apply to “resume” his Canadian citizenship 365 days after that, which he probably could have done by 2003 or 2004 at the latest, and flip Jean Chretien the bird.
“I think what offends people is that instead of recognizing it as a national triumph and having everybody share in it, that the Obama administration has tried to make it look like the president did everything, including fast-roping out of the helicopter and pulling the trigger.”
The Design Team have some examples for you, please check out their blogs for more info:-
Moreover, another natural sinus infection cure is to apply warm compresses to face. This increases the blood circulation in the sinuses that is responsible to quicken the movement in the cilia of the patient. The process is very simple, all you need is to take a wet towel soaked in warm water and place it over your face. Repeat this exercise at least three times a day for 4-5 minutes.
We attempted looking at a few other places after looking at that condo but to me I couldn’t imagine being anywhere else. I had to have that stretch of water and sand in my sights at any moment I desired. I shamelessly admit to spending an hour today sitting on our new front yard with my feet buried past their ankles in warm sand the consistency of a powdered sugar while picking up handful after handful of it and letting the breeze carry it out of my hands.
#5 Drink More Water
I don’t want Horizon to be a cosy refuge for writers looking for allies and a comfortable place to sleep. I want it to prickle with energy, both negative and positive; to challenge preconceptions about the writing of poetry and fiction; to question methods of criticism and modes of thinking in a frank and open manner.
Mat 14:28 And Peter answered him and said, Lord, if it be thou, bid me come unto thee on the water.
We love the little kitchen and it gets tons of use. Here you can see little man playing with the sink faucet. It is the perfect size for him and he loves to "cook" all kinds of things like cars, balls, pretty much any toy that fits in his little pots and pans :)
"The perfect pink for sticky situations." I can't help but LOL at their creative description.
8 Life On Mars?
Not even your own inner soul,
Official Testimony to DC37 on 05/26/2011
“Do you have a picture of him?”
6. Letter To Evan
I spend a while exploring the interior of church, which has much of interest: the pendulum which, unusually, descends from the clock tower above to sway slowly to and fro above the crossing; the original cherubic ‘quarter boys’ which once stood outside high up on the clock tower (their places now taken with modern replicas); Norman arches on the west side of the north transept. But the highlight of any visit is the chance to ascend the tower. I pay my £2.50, and climb a narrow staircase, to an even narrower stone passageway, from where one can look down onto the crossing and chancel far below. Barely wide enough for one, let alone for two people to pass, I have to reverse three times to allow people to descend (banging my head on a timber roof truss each time), then climb time-worn stone steps into the ringing room. A wooden tablet on the wall commemorates the ringing of ‘A Peal of Grandsire Triples, 5040 Changes, A Variation of Holt’s Ten-Part’ on ‘Monday May 30th 1898 in Three Hours and Two Minutes’. Opposite, the clock mechanism, dating from 1561 and one of the oldest working church clock mechanisms in the country, continues to mark time, as it has done for 450 years. A steep wooden staircase leads up into the belfry, where the bells – not those stolen by the French in 1377, but ones cast in 1775 – hang still and silent. A narrow wooden walkway leads across the gloom of the belfry, through the slimmest of doors out into bright light and fresh air on the tower parapet.
After that friendly banter, you can say “I’d love to stay here chatting, but I have something really important to do”. You can then return to your office and sleep under the desk for two hours. Repeat process.
The stone bridge arches across the San Antonio River the same since the WPA days. As kids, my sister and I would play down on the River Walk just before dark and watch all the couples walk hand in hand along the shallow waterway. History has a way of adding to the flavor of new beginnings. The mating dances were hardly notice by us two youngsters, more interested with catching frogs.
This week's pre-publication "can't-wait-to-read" selection is:
4. Roll and cut into slices.
It's not that I've been sick. I haven't.
Those walking speeds are quite poor, aren’t they? We need to bump up that walk to at least a 15 minute pace. I’m okay with our running speed. That’s not so bad. But the walking is much too slow so I’ve been reading up on what exercises we can do to increase our speed.
It’s definitely easier for me to think of Jesus as simply a human person who lived a long time ago.
My favorite is the butterfly. That means "fluttering around the room". I don't think Anna has ever received the butterfly (in the beginning of the school year, she came home with a turtle every day for weeks!) And as the year has progressed, we see more and more bees coming home.
Amazingly, we have been provided with our own personally, genetically, specifically formulated cold cream from the moment of birth that will prevent peeling of newborn skin as it acclimates to the extra-uterine environment, as well as protects against all the icky stuff it might
- I drew cheesy hearts in the sand with the year & initials in them. (you would too.)
the month kicks off this weekend with the long island marathon. i've run this one before (2009) and missed a bq by just a few seconds! my goal, on the ambitious side given my training, is a 3:30 to bq. we'll see how it turns out. on the downside, it conflicts with one of my favorite races, the law day 5k in darien.
Today, because of its history and the growth of nearby Laughlin, Nevada, Oatman has been revived and visited by many tourists. Roaming around the streets of the town are wild burros that are rumored to be descendants from the pack animals let go by early prospectors. These burros are protected by the U.S. Department of the Interior. People are told to be cautious around the donkeys because they are wild and who knows what they might do if provoked. Weekends in Oatman, visitors are entertained by Wild West shootouts, and many other celebrations. The town celebrates the Route 66 location with “Route 66” signs all over the place and souvenirs for the tourists. One of the things you will notice while visiting the Oatman Hotel is all the one-dollar bills on the walls and ceiling of the bar and restaurant. The say there is thousands of dollars adorning the inside of the hotel.
Meet Ben Van Leeuwen. He used to drive a Good Humor truck, but this summer got his own wheels. Now he has two creamy-colored trucks from which to peddle his creamy-rich ice cream.
Tam asked us: what is the most important thing about your faith that you want your kids to know? For me, it is that we can each have a personal relationship with Father in Heaven; that we each have access to His guidance and to feel of His love in our lives. I want my children to feel His power and have experiences that bring them to trust Him as I do. Then it will be their faith on which they rely and not mine.
My newest creation! This my TOY STORY "Jessie" dress ($38)....my interpretation of the character's outfit. It features a yellow bandanna with stitched detailing and cow ruffle on the top. The pants are denim with a cow print jumbo ruffle. Available in sizes 0-6 months, 6-12 months, 12-18 months, 18-24 months, and 2T, 3T, 4T, 5T. Larger sizes available by special order.
One of the things we all try to do when writing fiction is to make our characters well rounded.. we don't want our Main Character, (MC), to drag around some cardboard cutouts that he talks to on occasion.. we want people who stand up on their own, not only do they walk and talk, but they yell, argue, spit, drink, swear, and fight on occasion I'm sure.
Okay, so many of you will not be that floored or amazed after all. This headline was in the free newspaper they hand out at the metro, the article crammed at the bottom of the page below an advice column about filling out tax forms. The online article also has zero comments. However, I think it is huge news!
Despite Seadra’s species name as the Dragon Pokemon, it’s not part Dragon until it evolves into Kingdra (which was introduced in Gen II). If a Horsea has the Swift Swim ability, when it evolves into Seadra, its ability changes to Poison Point instead, but will change back to Swift Swim if it evolves into Kingdra. Seadra is the only non-Poison type that can have Poison Point as an ability.
Your presence we’ll miss and the memories we’ll treasure,
There are so many designers today that I really admire. To narrow it
“Aceh is a Shariah region,” Illiza added. “Everyone should obey it and the punk community is clearly against Shariah.”
5:55 - Receive phone call from Jeremy to tell me to eat supper without him, he's running late getting home because a train is stopped on the tracks, and he loves me :-)
The fastest and strongest MU are then recruited.
The scattered scholar’s schooling taught
Last night I spent a little time with some Liberals to celebrate the 30th anniversary of the Canadian Charter of Rights and Freedoms. Ralph Goodale noted a few of the other anniversaries coming up this year in his speech to the crowd of about 50 people. I was perhaps the youngest person there. I also met the Saskatchewan Liberal’s new interim leader, Greg Gallagher. Greg is from Crystal Lake, north of Canora.
Or at best, it’s a neutral tone. Regardless, it isn’t chromatic.
It has helped my fiction writing immensely. When I read fiction I wrote five or so years ago, I can see the writing. When I read things I write now - well, let's just say that, to use another word thrown around a lot on The Voice (Hi Joel!), I believe the voice wins.
9 . Blank Generation
So June marks the official start of summer or some shit, and with that comes all that cool shit that I like to do in the summer... like stay indoors out of the shitty sun and shitty heat and watch shit on TV.
The reason I'm going in to all of this is start teaching a Cooking class at the school for 9-13 yr Old . I'm so excited to be able to have this opportunity to help kids love being in the kitchen. I feel like I'm giving them a little bit of a Adventure in life to. be having them enjoy tasting the food they create.
Over the next few weeks this little family will be particpating in several exciting events. Adrian will be heading to school next Monday which I am sure will be more of an adjustment for me then it will be for her! Luckily we will just be easing into it as I dont go back to work till the 22nd. Immediately following the start of school Adrian will be getting baptised into the Lutheran faith by the same Pastor that married us almost 3 years ago. This will be a very special day for her.
But DO go by The Cafe and see what's going on and I have one more post next week with a giveaway from The Cafe...Yay!!!!
One of our most popular posts was the Indiana project reveal!
This story for me is symbolic of how difficult and problematic racism is in this country. Was I offended that this woman presumed my prejudice when the reality is she clearly didn’t understand subway seating etiquette? Of course. But did I still feel somehow cowed by her exclamation, or ashamed that I had done something that could even be perceived as racist? Absolutely. Black people, as Touré points out repeatedly in Post-Blackness, can’t help but feel defensive when it comes to how they’re being perceived by whites. After all, there are hundreds of years of history to back up their suspicion. In the 150+ interviews with black leaders and cultural figures Touré conducted for this book, many said that they still wouldn’t feel comfortable eating watermelon in a room full of white people, or ordering fried chicken in a predominantly white restaurant. Many said they adjust their body language, or speech, when they’re around white friends and colleagues, or try to appear less “threatening” to account for any accidentally assumed attempts at intimidation.
The Home Secretary is, as we know, currently under pressure defending a decision to relax immigration controls. Nitschke’s arrival could well add to those difficulties.
Bobette Vanstee: I have been using this Mother’s Day Gifts for 1 week now. Nice built quality.
Updated: 11/10/2010 with more ideas!
With Chen reportedly out of the embassy just a few hours after Clinton's arrival, the image of the bum's rush surely comes to mind.
Both graduates of Vancouver Island University's Interior Design program Kyla and Amber are both registered designers and members of IDIBC and IDC. Amber is also a LEED certified designer - they certainly have their design credentials covered! After realizing the wonderful chemistry and passion for design that they shared while in their previous careers in other successful firms, they decided that they would make great business partners, and thusly, it wasn't long before Inoui was born. Inoui is described as having a focus on " interiors with a creative and sustainable edge"; their ingenious ways of incorporating repurposed or eco-friendly materials into projects is never obvious, they are used as focal points or flow seamlessly within the space for a fresh and crisp, yet inviting and welcoming result.
The simple setting for our cake & games party. The Pooh Pinata was strung for the party!
The Japanese study found that the trend of current sunspot activity is similar to records from that period.
Please do check back inbetween now and the 15th January as we may have a wee tutorial for you.
History SG D
Following on from the Pink Terror (see previous post) I decided to backwash the Maus with a watered Anita's Acrylic Black Metalic wash:
Stumbled across the Ad Contrarian blog a while ago and… it is by far my favourite blog. I grabbed this wonderful book as soon as I could as I wanted to have the best of Bob close at hand…. As a long time ad guy who cut his teeth on the work of Ogilvy, Bernbach et al, I just love the way Bob thinks and writes about our crazy business and even more crazy world. This is take no prisoners kind of stuff that is just superbly written always. Buy it, read it. If you are like me it will make you laugh, make you cry and shake your head in wonder.
Vitamin D for Digestive Health
Confused, or pig-headed? Maybe a little of both.
Poisons come out
I say: What would Sontag do?
the optometrist is curious to know
“When you’re in contention and not end up, go home and evaluate what did and what you can improve,” he said. “And this is what I did.” Bubba Watson, Ben Crane and Jason Dufner were other players in the tie at 3 under, with Peter Hanson also to that number, but still in progress.
Two European trademark blogs, MarkenBlog and Class 46 referred to a publication in Germany’s business newspaper Handelsblatt on the effect of the proposed new "Bilanzrichtlinien modernisierungs gesetz” (Accounting Directives Modernizations Law). According to the two blogs this introduces new accounting rules for small and medium sized companies how and when to report development costs of their intellectual property on their corporate balance sheet.
While some of the tension is resolved with Joshua’s response, even more suspense is directed towards Yahweh’s response to Joshua’s unilateral decision. However, the text quickly resolves this tension by citing Yahweh’s approval. With renewed confidence, Joshua marches through the night to mount a surprise attack. The text goes out of its way to describe the extent of defeat and destruction of the Amorite armies by the Israelites. Yahweh is involved at every location of the battle providing support and resorting to a greater magnitude of lethal force than the Israelites.
Another thing going through my head were the words of Bill Bowerman (courtesy of Donald Sutherland in Without Limits):
Elizabeth Wilson / ‘If this can be called thinking’ / 14-15
Alyson Burdette currently lives in a small town in Ohio. She graduated from The University of Akron, where she majored in Anthropology. When she’s not writing, she spends her time hiking, dancing, and hunting for ghosts.
Home prices: People living in liberal areas suffered the most when it came to housing prices. Over the past year, the housing price index fell 3.5% in blue states. The index edged up by 0.03% in conservative states. Nationwide, it was down 2.4%, according to the Federal Housing Finance Agency’s House Price Index. Over the past five years, housing prices in red states fell 7.5%, but by 18.5% in blue states.
Pratt Street Ale House
So, I’ve had some results from Deviantart, but I bet you WordPress witches could do better! I can’t wait to hear from you all and to ask the questions!
As internet look for results guests are very focused – they become your suitable customers. And this allows you to preserve big cash on purchasing AdWords, ads, e-mail programming and other conventional online marketing promotion. Get going cash now, you your funds more successfully.
Our flying record isn't great. We had not flown since 2005. We were trying to book a holiday, abroad, in 2006 around the time that the terrorist bomb plot to blow up airlines, flying between Heathrow and the US, using liquid explosives, was discovered, which resulted in the current liquid restrictions. At the time there was so much uncertainty that we decided to holiday in the UK, avoiding the need for flying. This trip to Amsterdam was to be a practice, so that we could become familiar with the new regulations, in preparation for a trip, later in the year, to see husband's nephew, who is working in California. In the intervening years we have travelled by ferry to Ireland and France. It is a much more relaxed means of travelling.
I’m getting these urges to cut, and my heart starts to beat fast and I already get a ‘high’ from it even just from the thoughts.
But …
I am flower and ocean. I am eagle and dolphin. I am shaman and wizard. I am virgin and whore. I am wind and fire. I am stars and stardust. I am you, you, you, and me. I am love. I am joy. I am everything and nothing.
RailCorp describes the inherent requirements as compliance with its drug and alcohol policy, upholding its safety-first values and performing the duties faithfully, diligently, carefully, honestly and with the exercise of skill and good judgment.
The time is now and today. Onward, my Screnzy friends. We will show the world bravery, or at least a new level of madness. Write that movie you’ve always wanted to see. Write that play. Write that TV series. Write that comic book, darn it.
Yes, this is what I want. But the emptiness of the street seemed to be making too much of a statement. Why is it empty? Is it a ghost town? Did the plague wipe out the population? Am I making a statement about death and abandonment?
is told in a unique and well thought out fashion. Flashbacks to the past are wonderfully written to flow flawlessly with the present, giving you an amazing insight into Nate and Adam’s relationship. Though Nate seems childish at times, his feelings are warranted. He has a tragic past and is still raw from the experience. I felt his heartache and his triumphs.
Waiting for warm paint to coagulate in creamy clusters at the center.
In 1999, we were treated to a three-way race between Donovan McNabb, Akili Smith, and Tim Couch. The interesting thing about that year was that none of the three quarterbacks came from schools that are traditional powers. Two of the three became busts (Smith and Couch), but in all fairness, anyone drafted by the Bengals or the expansion Browns had the deck stacked against them. McNabb ended up leading the Eagles to five NFC Championship games (including four straight), and a Super Bowl, although there are a lot of Philly fans out there that would consider McNabb a bust.
Last April, my husband and I headed north to re-unite with family around my sister-in-love’s table. A gracious hostess, she opened up her heart and home for the invasion of her crazy family. The occasion was a solemn one — we gathered to honor the life of their mom. Ms. BJ’s children lovingly placed her next to her husband in the family plot and planted a beautiful blossoming tree to commemorate her life. Over the last year, the eldest sibling has served as executor of the estate — carrying out her final wishes to bless her family. Daily, her children honor her legacy by extending to others the generosity and kindness that Mom modeled for them. I have learned such rich lessons through their example.
Revisiting NEStalgia. Out of no where, the game got addicting again. I'm finding new builds so I can update the skill tree builds guide. Got three new classes almost at 32 I can make some builds for. Ranger is definitely going to have the most different builds, I believe; such a diverse class!
The book goes on to tell the reader about the vampires he stalks and eventually destroys, which include actual events which took place while Abraham Lincoln was the President of the United States of America. Even famed writer and poet Edgar Allan Poe makes an appearance in the tale (which is quite fitting, upon finding his inspiration for writing his poem “Lenore”).
It's been rainy and yucky here. The kids have been a little grouchy, i've been in pain (aka grouchy)...while sitting the kids in seperate corners. I asked them what project they wanted to start next (as they have wrapped up just about all the things they've been working on since Jan). They sat quietly a moment, glaring at each other; then my youngest said, "I bet i can design a better castle than you" to which my oldest replies "no way. Mom's on my team, dad's on yours." (mind you they are still glaring at each other) Youngest, "conditions...specifications?" Oldest, "has to be designed fully in blue print form, and built so it can open like a doll house to see the inside. And it has to be at least 1 cubic foot in size" Youngest, "and it has to be made in one week" Oldest, "deal....mom, can we find an architecture app?" Then my kids spent a super quiet 4 hours with rulers, pencils, and computer and ipad applications for drafting, designing their own castles. They are planning on using a variety of materials to build....can't wait!
-We put wet diapers into the grocery bag and toss them downstairs to our washer (no extra steps). We lightly spray the poo diapers with biokleen bac-out enzyme-fighting spray to help break down the poo. (This stuff is amazing and basically breaks down all the poo before you're even ready to wash it. You can find it on Amazon, but I purchased it at our local "green" store.)
I managed to contact my brothers, before finally arriving at Kelana Jaya station at 6pm and arriving home at 7 pm.
"No. It's not like that. You know I don't like it when Dad watches The Wire? Or when there's bad stuff on the news? It's because I actually feel those shots, those punches. It hurts like real. I know it sounds mad but I swear it's true." The girl burst into tears.
Both Radulov and A. Kostitsyn have been notable in the playoffs thus far for the Predators, with Alexander notching one goal and five assists and AK46 three goals and one assist. Although Radulov’s puck-handling will be missed, AK46 could possibly be the thorn in Nashville’s side on Wednesday night.
Who do you think would even SEE him
So now I’m back to wondering… did I do so much good in the past, am I so special and wonderful, did my husband do such awesome good deeds, that now we are reaping what we sowed? I don’t know, but what I do know is that I must leave it all up to my Accountant; I need to just pour my good works into His lap and let Him add or subtract, multiply or divide the numbers. I don’t need to be concerned about the blessings others may receive, as the ones I receive are specially tailored for me, my distinct situation and unique wants and needs–in due time. “For the eyes of the Lord move to and fro throughout the earth that He may strongly support those whose heart is completely His…” 2 Chronicles 15:9 Is my heart the Lord’s? That’s all I need to be concerned about. He’s in charge of the balance sheet.
There are so many amazing Teacher Blogs out there, and I am amazed at how these fabulous teachers have helped to keep me motivated, have inspired me, and have given me the comfort to know that I am not alone in my struggles and triumphs of this profession. Here are some amazing sites that I have recently stumbled across, and would like to pass this award to:
This night was mine, to be set fully free
Application
Oder complains that "the minority-owned engineering firm that will oversee air monitoring and safety requirements during asbestos abatement at several buildings is based in Staten Island, and the minority-owned plumbing company that will disconnect water and sewer lines to the buildings is based in Queens."...Oder is pretending to be concerned that the minority businesses getting in on Atlantic Yards happen not to be based in Brooklyn. In reality, opponents of Atlantic Yards have demonstrated that they couldn’t care less about black businesses or black economic empowerment in Brooklyn or anywhere else.
in alternate directions, held together by hidden screws....
Brouwerij Het Anker Gouden Carolus Tripel
Here are my top ten quotes from George Orwell.
Trijntje Oosterhuis: Backing Vocals
Thanks, Apple!!
Sometimes I find myself wondering what it would be like to have just ONE baby go through one thing or another. :) But, three babies is all that we've ever known. I'm sure that having one sick baby is exhausting... but let me tell you...THREE? They've been sick since 1:00ish Monday morning...and Clif and I are dead on our feet.
Do you feel like you’ve made discoveries from creating this music that moves you?
I stiffened another nod.
There is no one else like you
Heat: As it gets colder, I grow more and more thankful for shelter and for heat. I grow especially thankful when I think of all the people out there who do not have warm homes to retreat to every night. Thank you so much, heat, for keeping me warm.
This transition is so bittersweet. We love Portland and the community we have found here. It is hard to leave because of the people we love. It's also not hard to leave because we have such a peace about this next stage.
To sum this up: when we are unjustly wounded by men, let us overlook their wickedness (which would but worsen our pain and sharpen our minds to revenge), remember to mount up to God, and learn to believe for certain that whatever our enemy has wickedly committed against us was permitted and sent by God’s just dispensation. (Calvin – Institutes 1.17.8)
A GIFT FROM THE EDITORS
Some of my favourite music from twothousandandeleven. This year there have been quite a few good albums although there wasn’t anything that completely blew my mind….maybe I’m getting picky in my old age. If anything this was the year where the guilty pleasure reared its oft-concealed head.
It's not very often that I'm happy with the cards I make, but I was really pleased with how this turned out. I think it's because I took my time over it and spent a few days colouring the image. I do love all things French, so maybe that had something to do with it too, lol!
“Yes, of course,” Roy said. “I appreciate the prompt attention. She had us really worried. Will we be able to see her now?”
Finally it stopped snowing...
I did use Crayola glitter paper on each one to tie them together and make them unified in some way. Bright colors add zing to any room, and since my kitchen is boring ol' beige, this should do the trick for sure! Enjoy!
I haven't blogged in so long! I have been a total slacker these days in the blogging world.
I’m a star. I am famous. I’m everyone’s favorite actress from everyone’s favorite soap opera. Finally, being recognized as the best.
If you learned how to swim
It was absolutely delicioso! It is very rich, so we served coffee with it, which brought out the cocoa really well. I will most definitely be making this one again!
Well, as you can tell i loved everything about it and I haven't even talked about how beautiful the city was.
“No matter,” she thought to herself while consulting her map of the city to determine how to navigate back to the Cathedral where she was staying. “I think it still looks stunning.”
Here’s my video that describes my implementation
That's what keeps us on the hop!!
Strike while the.....bug is close.
Hands down, my favorite anime/ manga of all times!!!!
Is it God?
One argument for Pawlenty is that he would help the ticket with evangelical Christians who are suspicious of Mormonism.
When I received my firm's Open Enrollment package a week ago, I noticed that the benefit on transit passes was being reduced while the benefit for parking was increasing. I've done a bit of digging to discover that these are called "Qualified Transportation Fringe Benefits" and the limits were set at $230/month for both transit passes and parking during the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act, signed by President Obama in 2009. However, the benefit on transit passes was apparently temporary, and is being cut back to $125/month in January. Meanwhile, the benefit for parking is getting a cost of living adjustment (COLA) and increasing to $240/month.
What troubles me is that according to a study conducted by the Guttmacher Institute, 68% of women who have abortions in the United States say that they cannot afford to have children and 27% cite this as their primary reason for terminating the pregnancy. 20% cite health reasons. 38% are young women either hiding pregnancies from their parents, or ordered by their parents to terminate their pregnancies. So pro-choice and pro-life advocates are failing miserably.
I received a hard copy of Blue Christmas yesterday, signed by Mary Kay Andrews, to give away to one of my readers. She's one of my favorite southern authors. I wrote about MKA here and gave you a little tour of her beach house. Her books are just so much fun. Page turners, hard to put down. This one definitely involves decorating!
It's amazing what all can be done with a little thread and some ingenuity
His subtle yet powerfully amusing foreign billionaire charisma could have only helped in establishing the Nets' emerging presence within the city. But the bravado Mikhail Prokhorov brought with him was lost on an entire season. For an owner's part, there is a Media war with Jim Dolan to be won, and Mikhail Prokhorov failed to assert his presence in this town after so effectively arriving on the scene. To me, the winter was an opportunity lost on him to befriend Brooklyn prior, and leading up to this Fall's Opening season inside brand new Barclays Center. Billboards can only get one so far.
Seriously, get it!
Kavita Balaso Mane came to Orphan’s Home with her old grand father when she was just 6 years old. One of the Pastors recommended this child. When she was born her mother kept her in the house and went away with someone. Where her mother went and whether she is alive nobody knows, suddenly she left the home and till today she has not come back. They did police complain, searched every where, but there is no trace of her.
Heating up:
In some ways, the girls are worlds apart. Ivy June lives up in the mountains with her grandparents, Mammaw and Pappaw Mosely, because it's so crowded at her parents' place. Catherine lives with her family in a beautiful house with plenty of space for everyone. As the girls spend time in each other's neck of the woods, they find out that they've both been keeping secrets. And when, without warning, Ivy June and Catherine face the terror of not knowing what's happening to their loved ones, they discover that they may be more alike than different.
I liked the sequence where Ryan’s interaction with Royals is shown. When he is interacting with Queen then he is a different character but when he is interacting with Prince, he actually talks to him man to man and helps the Prince to come out of gloom. Another important aspect is details on policing and investigating work. Sometimes police gets lucky with some information but then they do real comprehensive work to nail the culprits.
Paper: Basic Black, Gable Green, Whisper White, DP- K&Co
In her capacity as a Board Member, Mary-Jo is looking forward to sharing insight with the AjkunBT Well Being Unit. The Well Being Unit works with AjkunBT dancers on injury prevention, general medical services and holistic medicine. Mary-Jo will work with the Well Being Unit to help “engage providers for maintenance and preventive care for dancers.”
You know how you go to one website looking for something and, somehow, three hours later you find yourself reading a site with no idea how you got there? Well, somehow I happened upon the Jokes4Miles site.
Yes, you read it correctly! ;D Since it is National Poetry Month I thought we should push our boundaries. I see you nodding your heads, but you question how will we do this?! You will select a favorite quote or one that speaks to you at this moment in time. Pen a poem inspired by the quote you have selected. Please share the quote you selected with the poem. I'm betting on some insightful poems. I wonder if a few of us will pick the same quote?!
If there wasn’t any music to accompany our meal, there was a sea of cowboy hats where at least one-quarter or more of breakfast crowds sported a cowboy hat. A work colleague told me she knew an enthusiastic woman or two, who had spent over the years, up to $30,000 on cowgirl fashion garb, boots and accessories. Once I passed by such a gal who had splashed on alot of perfume: no barbecue nor bacon grease smells could touch that whiff.
It’s Arjun’s wise friend (Pavan Malhotra), peering around some Bollywood balloons, who sees the love he has in his eyes for Ganga. Can you see it too?
When I'm tired you rub my bones.
It's extraordinary that we must wait four more years for “pre-existing condition” to be wiped out of the insurance-industry vernacular.
I can't believe tomorrow they will be 10 weeks old!
Flour- 1 1/2 cups
Our visit was so relaxing: great accommodations, wonderful visit with family, fabulous food by Lynette, Nanna and Steve, and to top it off I was able to get my "dog fix" in by hanging out with Buddy, Lucy and Finster - I, unbeknownst to Lynette, Steve and Larry, was trying to figure out how I could "sneak" the dogs into our car without anyone noticing - oh how I wish Jack (our cat) would accept a canine roommate! I thought I took more pictures, especially of family, but I was so busy enjoying the visit that I forgot to take pictures!
Visit to a Hallowed Ground
1 vanish
Brothers Winchester, Remington and Colt know the legends—they were trained from childhood to destroy demon predators, wielding the latest steam-powered gadgetry. It’s a devil of a job. But sometimes your fate chooses you...
This is the only company I have ever work for that has this kind of policy (the policy is backed by the department of labor).
here at Heaven's Walk.
That being said, the fact that this blog post quoted this study as saying that the normal time it takes for people (but men, in particular) to fall in love and then express that verbally is 97 days, blew my mind.
It was not until later when I found out that my aunt was not jubilant at all. She quickly realized that she could only hit half the soprano notes, and shortly after I left, a woman beside her, a German woman (it would always be a German woman who would correct you, we would soon discover), told her sharply, “You are not a soprano. Go over there with the altos.”
...at least, we are for the next 30 days. I could say more, but the SPA might be listening. Instead, I'm going to think about lizards, and Tony Danza, and Subarus.
Next I cut a black panel and a chipboard panel with the Vintage Cabinet card die, which by the way is back in the shop here. I inked up the Damask texture fade with an Encore Ultimate Metallic Gold pad and ran my black cabinet card panel through it. What a cool texture that created! An opening was cut in the cabinet card panel with the large ticket Mover and Shaper die and the Marche aux Fleurs panel was affixed behind it. Then that entire layer was affixed onto the chipboard cabinet card die cut. All of my butterflies were stamped on white CS, sponged with Broken China and Scattered Straw ink and fussy cut. I just felt that it somehow needed more gold so I added the two bright brass pieces of filigree metals. Oh, and I sprayed the background and the Marche aux Fleurs panel with Biscotti Perfect Pearls before I assembled the entire piece. I'm sort of disappointed about how this card shows up in the photos because it is really pretty IRL.
Hey darlings. Sorry for boring you with this hair and skin. But i just love them lol. Cant seem to take em off.
The evening after the playdate, she emailed me and thanked me. She said she had had a great time, that I was so easy to talk to and that we should get together on a weekend when both husbands were free. I was so excited and emailed her back, telling her that this was a great idea. And NEVER heard from her again! Since then I have seen her in the school pick up line and we have waved and smiled but that is it! It seems so strange to me and when I ask others what I should do, many say I should just let it go. It wasn't meant to be. What do you think???
I thought it was so cool of Kara to show us. We went back to the triage room to discuss what to do from there. The issue was that we had no way to really determine when my water had broken. That fact, along with a couple dips in Jack’s heart-rate (which was otherwise nice and strong) caused Kara some concern. She consulted with the doctor the midwives work with at Mercy and told us that she really felt it was
We continue driving and finally after passing through the town of Bushmills we arrive at the Giant’s Causeway. We park the car and walk to the entrance to the park and we are presented with the site of the Causeway diving into the sea.
APRIL 15 is the deadline for the filing of income tax return (ITR). President Aquino has reportedly filed his own ITR earlier this week. Under liability, he wrote, “Communications Group.”
1-13-2011
Mix ricotta, 1/2 mozerella/ parmesean mix, garlic, onion, & spinach.
But this project is all dependent on time. To succeed I'll need the time and space to write a short story a month as well as write the drafts required for the Traitor of Light. It won't be easy, and I've learned enough in the last year not to over-stretch myself, so I'll be playing it by ear - as ever.
Week 2 vs. Dallas: Seattle will look to end a skid against the Cowboys, as they hasn’t defeated them in six years, the last time being the 21-20 playoff victory over Dallas including the infamous Tony Romo botched field goal hold.
More important, however, is whether their recommendations are binding or independent. Here the ‘scholar problem’ looms again, because, according to Funds@Work, the seventeen scholars who are linked to AAOIFI make up around half of all board members around the world. ‘The reputation that comes with being on the standards-setting boards, as a substitute for the lack of sufficient governance standards in an emerging sector, basically is reason enough for many market participants to say, “We definitely need this guy,”’ says Ünal.
As the prostitution survivor and activist Natasha Falle has said, “Where there’s high-track prostitutes, escorts, strippers and masseuses; there’s pimp violence.”
Well all I can say is, if you miss out on these dumplings, you’re pretty crazy!
5. Sun Harvest veggie chips, 2 for $3 at Sun Harvest (through 2/2/11)
Oh, and for fuck sake, will you get rid of that cellphone! That’s last year’s model, it’s like… a million years old!
They are an extreme nuisance and I don't encourage them at all, though I know that some people do put food out for them.
It was January 2012. I hadn’t made any resolutions. I was just going with my wife to what I thought was a “smoothie place” because she had bought a Groupon months ago that was about to expire. I got the smoothie… and so much more.
At the southern end of the promenade is the Pleasure Beach, a large amusement park dominated by Britain’s largest roller-coaster, known simply as the ‘Big One’.
My opinion.
"Bon Appetite!"
Cinzia has prepared a zingy sauce - made with olive oil, anchovies, capers and a little cinnamon that is used to marinade poached trout or pike. The poached fish is left to infuse for at least half a day to ensure it soaks in those lovely flavours. Be sure to take a peek at the pike - that's a scary face!
Although Eugenie De Sade runs for less than 90 minutes, Franco crams an awful lot into his film; particularly during a remarkable first act, sowing the seeds of disgust as Albert introduces Eugenie to the delights of pornography, making it clear there are to be no boundaries. As the pair grow ever closer, Albert announces a business trip to Paris, where the couple will commit the 'perfect crime'.
Granny squares are the best way to learn to crochet. Try out Little Tin Bird’s tutorial, which I found really useful. My top tip is to make sure you are gently pushing your clusters of trebles around the ring, so to define the ‘corners’ of the square. Keep an eye on your tension, too: too tight, and your square might start to curl.
Yum! What a great gift idea for Valentine's Day. You can purchase a $30 voucher for Shari's Berries for $15 from Mamapedia (a daily deal site similar to Groupon). I think the best part apart Mamapedia is that they donate 5% of your purchase price to the school of your choice.
are you needing last minute ideas on what to get your mom or mother-in-law? here are a few gift items for sure they will love to receive (i know i do) :
I am incredibly humbled by the supporters, teammates, and the organization for inspiring over 500 runners to raise millions for an amazing cause. I’m already thinking I will do this again next year, for two reasons. One, it was hot that day, and I know I can do better! Two, the Dana-Farber marathon challenge group, as I said above, only got more amazing as my time in training with them went on. Running with them for a second time, I’ll know exactly what I’m in for and can fully invest myself in getting to know more teammates, volunteers, cancer survivors, and patient partners. The people are simply amazing.
And of course, I also want to remember to take the time to enjoy the sweetness of Spring time whenever possible.
I'm at a La Quinta in Houston, a rather odd place with a tiny little desk clerk straight out of Of Mice and Men. When I arrived I caught him watching the Victoria's Secret 'Fashion' Show, ('fashion' being surrounded by ironic finger quotes, cuz that ain't fashion, it's just T&A). Kind of funny. I hope the door locks are secure, though. And that there aren't any little secret cameras in this room. Yoiks. yeah, he kind of reminds me of one of those kind of guys. I'll change clothes in the closet.
Despite this face, William and Lydia actually get along very well :) My guess of his inner monologue: You mean we're can't eat until we sing a song? What is this nonsense?
I love stamping and I love stamps of many different kinds.
The stomps that told me all was right......
gaining only tangible seconds,
Parker: Ooof! Ooof! Ooof!
Help arrived, lurid blue lubricant applied and a scrawny, slimy, hip presenting black lamb was assisted earthside. We were all astonished at the size of the lamb, more like a floppy rabbit than anything else. What about the enormous belly! Was that all?
So long story short, it has been a difficult month but our Spending "Fast" has not been forgotten about. It is definitely in the forefront of our minds every time we think of even purchasing something.
I blog specifically about food allergies too often (although it really is layered into most of my posts) but I feel inclined to do so for a few minutes with Halloween right around the corner!
The skeleton of Rebellatrix
I'm thinking of all the challenges I used to participate in -- Sunday Postcard Art, Gothic Art Challenge, Think Monday Think ATC, Wednesday Stamper, Make A Moo or Two.....etc. Whew, it's exhausting just typing the list. Many of them are gone by the wayside now.
TUCKED into her New York Times obituary was this inexact statement: “She was born in Brooklyn 67 or more years ago…” The Grey Lady hewed to the 1854 birth date, but hinted at that sliver of uncertainty, which brings us back to 426 Henry St. in Cobble Hill.
Kirk: I’m not being a-…Lay Down Larry?? It’s just like me saying I’ll never go to the moon, and I’m alright with that too.
The first response I received was titled: Jobama Rectum Sniffer. It called our President “a treasonous n***ger,” told me to get my head out of his ass, and ended: “Safeguard the Constitution, Strive for the Death of all Domestic Marxists.” Another read: “You’re an idiot.” On the NPR website, I was called a “drooling liberal” who should invest in sturdy “knee pads.”
Whatever the case, RLS had a dream in September or October of 1885 that he claims set the basis for Jekyll and Hyde. Or a nightmare. He was screaming, and his wife woke him up. It was Jekyll and Hyde that he was dreaming about, and he set out to write the story immediately thereafter. He wrote it at a frenzied pace, finishing his first draft in a matter of days. Most sources say his wife found it so terrifying that he burned the manuscript. But he couldn't let go of the story and, almost immediately, started on it again. The new draft was also completed in a matter of days, and it was published in January of 1886 (don't you wish things happened that quickly these days?).
See? You win the argument every time AND you look like some kind of genius.
The vitamin B complex consists of 12 related water-soluble substances. Eight are considered essential vitamins because they need to be included in the diet. Four are not essential because the body can synthesize them.
If there is a time coming when the churches of America must face persecution, let it be according to Your will, Lord, and let us be found worthy in Your name. Give us strength as we daily face an enemy some of us don’t even think about once a week. Father, we need energy as we start a new school year, or at our jobs that just seem to drag on and on, in the heat, and in the struggle to find a quiet place away from the business of this culture. Be our Rock, our Tower of Strength against the enemy so we can be Overcomers.
I've conceded several times in this blog that when I'm settled and comfortable, I can appear to be fine. My brain's probably running on high revs, so it's relatively easy to create an illusion of near-normality. I know too that many people do see things but are polite enough not to point them out, and it's normal to focus on the positive – or, as we often do, talk of other things entirely, which is fine by me. Who wouldn't?
But EMV is predominately a contact sport -meaning that two computers need to plug into each other physically for it to function, which is why a contact EMV card needs to be inserted (or “dipped”) into the physical slot in the terminal until the transaction is over.
Here is another one of my cards I have made over the past few weeks but not had the chance to post until now. I had just received the Think Big Favorites #13 stamp set from Papertrey Ink and just couldn't wait to ink up that gorgeous font.
I've been sleeping in your room. It's cozy and the radiator squeaks and whistles and hums through the night. The view out the window of the backyard is lovely. I bet you were so proud to gaze upon that expansive yard in the mornings. It's a beautiful sight. I remember the last time we visited, we were out back and I walked around some of the yard with you. You were having so much trouble walking and you were upset that Diane wouldn't let you cultivate a garden that spring. You were a legendary gardener. We talked about your garden and the size of the squash and the flavor of the tomatoes that you grew.
Mix all ingredients with ice in a shaker or blender. Strain into a chilled cocktail glass.
We've all had friends like this growing up: someone has this big idea for making "The Greatest Movie Ever Made"(c), gathering all his best buddies together after school, sneaking off to some remote field, abandoned building, getting some red dye and Karo Syrup, making sure the battery in his dad's video camera was charged up and filming chunks of scenes pieced together in a notebook during lunch or study hall.
My mother says I've always been very wary of and unhappy with change. I know that to be true. I've always wanted to watch from the sidelines for a while, before I decide whether or not I want to join in.
Option 2: Stay put and pick the best player available.
I think she paid 60 cents for it….or was it 50 cents?…..Just a minute……
Kyle grinned and cut his eyes over to the glass bowl on the end table by the couch. Jim followed his gaze and returned the grin.
i dare the cats to take a dip they do
I mean a true all-inclusive … where you pay for everything up front and put your wallet away for the duration of the trip.
Here's a peek at the inside...
Authority. An elderly man. Guarding a church. Attacked. Shot. Dead.
I love all of u so much ayah, acik, adik n along.
What happens to them?
The other dwarves are lined up to slide down the slopes to the dragon. Remember that these are 12 foot high slopes, about 60 degrees, but they are covered in ice and you will slide easily. Also remember that ALL movements on the blue level will demand a dexterity check, and failure indicates you've slipped and fallen. You can throw anything 2 lbs. or less from a prone position on the ice, but you must take a round to stand up before you can attack with weapons. It takes a round because it is sheer ice and as such it is slippery. I will let you attack while laying on your back if the creature is directly above you.
There were about 200 in attendance and it was a beautiful, bright sunny day even though in January. I thought if Rob was looking down that he’d be happy so many turned out to bid him farewell. Although Rob was difficult to get along with sometimes, I was amazed at how many former employees showed up to pay their respects and it meant a lot to me and was a testimony as to how much respect they did have for Rob.
Yes, a good lie and a con job can go a long way.
A great man, Warren Buffet, never obtained his fortunes by worrying and groveling that he didn’t have enough. He was an entrepreneur who set forth to figure out a 1,000 ways to earn $1,000. He took simple steps and amassed his wealth over time.
We got out a copy of Rand McNally
though I'm sure you'd remind me if you had to
Factoid learned: Initially, I used my time with T. to try and glean legal advice as I was currently in the midst of a rough and tumble legal battle of the wits with the city government (well, that’s how I saw it, anyway). This concerned a $190 ticket I had received for biking through a red light several months ago. While T. thought it was hilarious that I was such a biker, he also got into the act. He informed me of the following facts (listen up, all you potential criminals):*
The last 6 weeks of the season, any of the Browns games could be grabbed by NBC for "Sunday Night Football", thanks to the NFL's "flex" scheduling rules. Of course, the Browns would have to be basically "on fire" in late season for that to happen, which is about as likely as your Primary Editorial Voice(tm) launching a 2012 presidential bid.
Connectivity : 1 x Micro SD slot, 1 x AC Jack, 1 x 3.5mm Earphone Jack, 1 x Mini USB, 1 x HDMI out
To proceed with this you need a rapnet login and password as this is closed network and not free to all.
I started with a piece of this fantastic paper from 7 Dots Studio. I won this paper over at the Snazzy's Design Team blog and I love it! It has a lovely heavy texture to it and the patterns are soft enough to be used as a lovely background. I stamped the Flourishes Raspberries across the front and the sentiment from the same Berry Sweet set. I added the house from the Artistic Outpost - The Outpost plate in the corner.
The cynics will say that a 50/50 share of profits should also mean a 50/50 share of expenses in the publishing relationship between author and publisher. This is a fair and reasoned argument and in fact there are publishers pursuing this model of business like Matador and Pen Press in the UK, Moorsgates, an imprint of the now defunct Cold Tree Publishing tried it in the US (see article). Partnership publishers existed long before HarperStudio's arrival in 2008, and it should be remembered that they are only just starting to publish the first of their imprint titles this year. But where HarperStudio and Bob Miller's business philosophy and modus operandi differ to many preceding partnership publishing models is that the author is spared from reaching for the wallet, pulse or credit card. This is the first time partnership publishing under these kind of terms have been adopted inside the family home of 'traditional' publishing (HarperStudio being an imprint of HarperCollins).
I buy dried organic apple pieces in packets, and they are Jacob’s very favorite food. A fantastic tantrum-stopper (is that bad?). I have to ration them carefully though, since realizing that more than a handful in a day results in a constipated little boy.
1. Use “What Would Make Me Happy” as the title of a new poem.
If you discovered, probably early in your life, that your genetic makeup left you susceptible to artistic impulses of some kind — it needn't matter whether that creative bent took the form of movies, writing, art, music, whatever — the odds weighed heavily toward you falling for at least one Catherine in your lifetime. (Now, I'm speaking from the point-of-view of a straight male. I wouldn't dare presume straight female or gay perspectives, though I've witnessed similar dynamics secondhand.) As far as we go, the Catherines of the real world function like those purple-hued bug zappers hanging on summer porches and inevitably drawing us like moths to their pulsating light and our doom — and we wouldn't trade one goddamn miserable minute of it if it meant losing a single second of the joy. This isn't a new phenomenon: F. Scott had his Zelda and Tom had his Viv during the same era when Jules and Jim takes place. (A brief aside: I think Tom sent me a personal message from the past when he published The Waste Land in 1922 and penned those lines, "April is the cruellest month.") To casual and outside observers, proclaiming that Catherine must be crazy comes rather easily and mounting a counterargument against that assumption makes for a steep climb. Yes, our real world Catherines come with a fair amount of mental instability, as do we, but without our neuroses and idiosyncrasies, we probably wouldn't be drawn to these wild, wonderful, wounding women in the first place. Of course, Henri-Pierre Roché's novel and François Truffaut's film take the men's point-of-view, even when filtered through Michel Sobor's narration, so Jules and Jim aren't portrayed as being as unstable as Catherine. The closest the male friends come shows through Jules' fear and neediness at times. As for the Catherines of the real world, people do have the capacity for change, no matter what David Chase might believe, and can end up being vital parts of your life even as you become the one holding the monopoly on the madness in the friendship. It's a cliché, but it originates from truth: Most of the best art stems from suffering. Anyone remember Billy Joel during the years when he and Christie Brinkley were happily married? Jules and Jim, for me at least, represents a cinematic temple to that idea. Of course, it also begs the question that if misery breeds great art, why in the hell haven't I accomplished something of note?
My understanding is this show is tied up because of its frequent use of popular music. Record companies are a bunch of greedy bastards, and won't let you use their songs like they used to (without shelling out big bucks).
upper
Susan B. Anthony List President Marjorie Dannenfelser agrees. “Sarah Palin is the whole package. Women voters are electrified, and Sarah is someone who is truly in sync with the way real American women think,” she said.
Evie is a girl whose parents had died when she was young. She was then raised by her Uncle (her mother’s brother) and is now an incoming freshman at college. She met a guy during the summer for college visitation named Alfred (whom she nicknames as Freddie) and more recently, during freshman orientation, meets a cute southern gentleman boy named Russell. She also has the fortunate opportunity to meed Reed…who unfortunately acts like a total jerk. He’s the strong, silent jerk type…but extremely hot.
Of course, though, Williams is using this as fuel for her argument that novels are beside the point in our urgent search for an understanding of our contemporary world, and in any case she quotes Damien Barr, who runs the Shoreditch House Literary Salon, as accusing contemporary novels of failing to engage with big/political issues in any form whatever: 'There is this false idea that fiction has no particular stance because it is made up, as a result of which it doesn't have to be informed, and it doesn't have to inform. I think we desperately need to be informed about our times, and our history, and our human condition, and at the moment, the novel is really only good for the latter.'
The success of iPhone created Apple introduce four sophisticated versions and the reason behind it’s achievement was that the gadget supported the introduction of easy applications making it much more amazing. With the iPhone becoming effective, the interest in iPhone Apps can also be increasing. cheap swtor credits It was during July 2008 when the quantity of apps monthly were Five hundred and today there are other compared to Three hundred and fifty,000 apps available in the apps store and also the store offers observed an amazing number of downloads in the iPhone users. The largest benefit which apple iphone customers received was that the device backed third party apps which revolutionized the way these units accustomed to function.
Individual Maximum Contribution in a Defined Contribution Plan: A total of $50,000 can be contributed on behalf of an individual, up from $49,000. This total includes employee 401(k) deferrals and employer contributions such as profit sharing or matching contributions. The $5,500 catch-up can bring the maximum to $55,500.
3 ask
Fermement, à haute voix, il dit sa coulpe.
Que sé yo
Skin can crave. I have learned this
If I was not multitasking I couldn’t do anything. Too many things were vying for my attention. In order for me to focus on any one thing I had to do at least three things simultaneously.
Shocker, right?
Papa John's has yet to respond to the incident in a statement or its Facebook and Twitter accounts, but with such a PR disaster on their hands, they most likely will soon.
I just cannot get over the fact that Thanksgiving is this week. I just can't wrap my mind around that. Not to mention the fact that Christmas is right around the cornor. I am so not ready. I have hardly anything bought yet which is so unlike me. Ryan and I are planning on going Friday, not early but at some point. Just hoping nobody else is sick and I'm feeling better by then. I just really don't know what to buy at this point.
To often we fail to see that in building our family members we are building our selves and strengthening our selves. We are largely known by who we associate with and we largely rise and fall based on the support structure we have beneath us.
He syllabicated the words in a really annoying way. His neck stretched like that of a giraffe’s, his spittle flying everywhere. Gross. I could feel my blood boiling. Then and there I realized I had to do something. I flashed just like Chuck and instantly learned kung-fu effortlessly. I showed him my favorite Manny Pacquiao impression, thanks to my feather connector ring. I broke his nose. And as if that wasn’t enough, I kicked him in the groin. The hardest kick ever. He should be thankful I was wearing flats and not my killer heels. And so with moves like Jagger that you bet the expat slumped himself over his friend’s shoulder and they simply walked away. Ha!
Malt: pale 2-row, Vienna, malted white wheat
1/2 cup molasses
Slow cooked lamb belly, with lemon, chives and tarragon, Beltane Farms yogurt on top, and a Fava bean mash on the bottom. The lamb was tender, juicy and flavored very well. The yogurt was tart and added a wonderful contrast to the inherent fattiness of the lamb belly. Chef Arik sent us out some brussel sprouts and we loaded up my plate: they were caramelized, flavorful, and made us lean back in our seats in awe. This course came with an impressive 2004 Barolo from Michele Chiarlo.
GOOD Friday. And it has been, so far. Matthew has the day off from classes, so we started out the morning with some puppy cuddles, fresh fruit, and delicious everything bagels from Central Market… and we both agree that these particular renditions were the closest we’ve ever had to our beloved New York bagels. Almost felt like we were back there in our favorite little cafe, watching the world bustle by.
At what point are we going to say enough is enough? That yes, some parents don't provide for their own kids either because they aren't able or they choose not to. But that we as a society we can't continue to let the lowest common denominator determine the best choice for all. If you, the school district, feel the need to provide a lunch: fine. But stop complaining about being overworked, underpaid, and your resources being stretched too thin while taking on more and more of our responsibilities as parents.
It really got me thinking - why shouldn't uncle be allowed to bring his nice clothes? Surely he has recognised the personaility that is is about to visit and wants to look his best!
Now, for the giveaway! I was so pleased that a lot of you liked the way I'd made my LSNED album, from an old ladybird book, that I've made another book just like it, especially for one of you lovely readers to win:
If you can't say it simply, don't say it at all.
“I will be here.” She left after that, holding back more tears, choking back emotion, feeling harassed, and convinced she had in some way caused her friend’s murder.
I like the ghostly affect and was surprised at how clearly his face appears considering I was hand-holding the camera at a slow shutter speed.
But the point of this post is not to give a detailed history or argue for one side or the other. I just want to stand back and made some broad(er) statements on the worship wars in general and how I would “mediate” both sides.
Is to experience a life with you
Doesn’t that make you want to eat something like that? When food is not natural why would you want to put it into your body? There is no reason I want to put something that is not made by nature into my natural body. I know better than to eat plastic or to drink poison, so why, oh why would I want to eat something that is not natural?
Plus, I'll make sure to link up to the Follow Friday periodically so everyone can check out the directory easily and new readers can get in on finding your blog.
When gas prices go up, so do airline tickets. American Airlines just announced today they were having to raise ticket prices by a minimum of $10 per trip in an effort to try and offset rising oil prices. Remember: airlines also charge you $25 to $35 per bag, claiming the extra weight causes the airplane to use additional fuel.
Home late, after driving two orphaned Boston Terriers to Indianapolis to be fostered. They’ve been with us since Wednesday. Their person, a lovely woman, died on Monday. They are a little shell-shocked, still confused and full of grief. I believe they will be cossetted until their new forever home is found. When they jumped into Beth’s car, though, they did not look back really, and that’s a good thing. Still, we’ll miss them here, the ladies.
perfectly ripe tomatoes - I used 4 large tomatoes
Comments: Since this is my mom's friend's recipe, I'm quite biased towards it because I thought it was a pretty good recipe to begin with. I did more tweaking for it the second time around, using 220g butter and just 40g of margarine to give it that crispiness. I also substituted some corn flour with milk powder to enhance the taste. Another recipe that I'll try again next year for open-faced tarts.
here’s where i stand – misunderstood. we run in circles, and there’s no escape. frankly, i’m so fucking tired. i don’t give a crap anymore. i doubt i ever did. it’s draining me slowly, every single day that passes by with another critism after another complaint after another blow-up. occasionally i wonder where i’d be in five years and i don’t see myself doing this anymore. i’m unravelling at the seams. should i be feeling this way? i’m not entirely sure why i’m not fighting for this, either. so we can all go along with the fuck it policy, and no one gets hurt. see, i used to be good at making friends and keeping them. i used to be good at getting over break ups. i used to be immune to people talking shit to me. after nearly seventeen years, i’m discovering that i suck at basically all of the above. the problem with me is that i either try too hard, or i don’t fucking try at all. the problem with me is that tiny part of me that feels sorry how this turned out and can’t seem to let go, and that other tiny part feeling bloody indignant about everyfuckingthing, and that voice at the back of my head asking why. the problem with me is that right now, i really don’t care about anything at all.
Mervin was introduced to music at age of nine (9) where he played drums for a church band ‘Conquers.’ Over the years he’s worked with several local artists within Belize such as the late Andy Palacio, Jacob Diggz, MessNjah, Mikal, Lady Indie, D-Revelation, Louis Wade, Blessed Child, Spiritual Chef, Exodus, Yesenia, Rey de Reyes, Dennis Requenia, Deady on the Beats and more.
I'm going to have to find some fun, indoor activites for winter. I can only handle talking her to the mall playground so many times.
his chest.
They’ve always said character comes to the rescue when crisis descends or hard times rule. And the other thing they say: Necessity is the Mother of Invention.
And We already know the answer to that.
This journey through John with you stirs some interesting thoughts and questions for me as we walk together through the gospel. We know that John wrote his gospel well after the death and resurrection of Jesus, some 55 or 60 years later. The destruction of Jerusalem took place in 70 AD and John wrote this gospel around 85 or 90 AD just before his exile to the Isle of Patmos. We also know that John wrote the book to new Christians and non-Christians to prove that Jesus is the Son of God and that all who believe in him will have eternal life.
Well, it’s not released yet so I haven’t heard it have I?
Maisa: I need something, Saameira.
“Where, how did I…”
Let not the child’s voice be heard, nor the mother’s entreaties,
Actually, as we were preparing it in the kitchen....the Trout is definitely the chopper and dicer, I started thinking that maybe this will be too bland. Nah....not at all. If you want a simple but great tasting soup that will be on the table with only 30 minutes of cooking.....look no further. Enjoy.
“I have one in readiness, sir, in the ice-box.”
Materialist relativism tells us that if we wish to relate nonviolently with others we need to learn, understand, and accept the material factors that shape the truth of their experience. If we love the Other, we need to accept that their location in social relations may differ from ours. That their embodiment may differ from ours. That their logic and perceptions may differ from ours. That their needs and interests, their fears and desires, may differ from ours. And to accept these things, not as static entities that will never change (because all things change continually), but as operating in the present moment. As neither good nor evil in themselves, but as bearing good or evil qualities only in relation to our own desires and interests. To observe with mindful acceptance the irreducibility particularity, the Otherness, of the Other.
11) what really scares you? (like spiders or the dark or whatever)
Retweets (RTs)
~What is the purpose of Life in itself?
World Health Organization (WHO). Assessment of health risks in infants associated with exposure to PCBs, PCDDs and PCDFs in breast milk. Copenhagen, World Health Organization (Environmental Health Series No. 29), 1988.
So in summary, these are the intriguing possibilities:
The subtitle gives the story away, but given the funny cartoons it was curiosity of how it is narrated that make a reader like me pick the book and read.
Having attended a poor black-only school near Horatio, Brown had never played organized football in school. But he had the body for it: 5’11” and 190 pounds—which was pretty good size for college football players in that era. So when it was time for walk-ons to report, Brown showed up to get his uniform. The equipment manager didn’t know what to do when Brown stood before him, so he told Brown to come back the next day. Brown did and got a uniform. But that’s about all he got. He got no playbook and he got no respect. And other than getting an earful of racial slurs, he was given the silent treatment by the team. A couple of assistant coaches showed minor support, but the head coach never met Brown or said one word to him.
When I was just a little girl in kindergarten, my mother bought me a new box of crayons. What made them so special was that I had graduated from the regular package of eight fat crayons to the older kid skinny crayons. These were the crayons for serious artists and had a lot more colors to choose from. I remember how excited I was to use them for the first time. On that particular day, my kindergarten teacher informed us that we were all going to color Poinsettias. I could hardly wait for her to get to me as she passed out the mimeographed copies of the beautiful Christmas flower. As soon as she set it down in front of me I opened up my new box of crayons and took out the prettiest blue I could find and began filling in the lined spaces with color. All of a sudden I heard the teacher yelling at me over my shoulder. “Who ever heard of a blue Poinsettia! Everyone knows that Poinsettia’s are red!” she said. She took my paper, crumpled it up in a ball, and threw it down in front of me. She told me to cross my arms and put my head down on the table and not show my face – and then took my new box of crayons and hit me on top of the head with them. All I remember was how sweaty my face was and that I was so afraid to even lift my face just a little to the side to breath. I remembered how my mother always told me to not ‘lay’ on my eyeglasses or I would bend them. (At 5 years old, I had crossed eyes and wore eyeglasses). I was so afraid I would break them. I worried about my new box of skinny crayons and thought that surely she broke them hitting me on the head as hard as she did. I was afraid my mother and father would be upset if they were broken and would also be mad at me for coloring the Poinsettia blue. But most of all – I felt sad that the teacher crumpled up my pretty blue flower.
V. G. Bunuan, Administrator, Sugar Quota Office.
Parking for Commencement
Hit the Street. The last, and most important step, is to make contact with the Creative Director, Associate Creative Director, or Senior Copywriter at the big advertising agencies in your city. A great place to start is at your local Ad Club, which often has a roster of contacts. You can also do a simple online search of advertising agencies and check out their website for contact information. Once you have their names, you can send them an email introducing yourself and asking for some time to critique your portfolio. It may sound daunting, but they’ve been in your shoes before, and are usually happy to squeeze in some time to give you feedback. During your meeting, make sure you let them know how much you appreciate their time, and ask for any advice or feedback on your work. Then make sure they know how interested you are in their agency. Who knows, maybe one of your ideas will make them want to give you a chance as an intern or a Junior Copywriter.
Middle row from left to right:- discovered a new shop Brissonte in North Reading, chilling out with an ice coffee and one of my favorite reads, a second daytrip to Rockport, Miss Marble the kitty we fed most of the summer
Excellent compensation package and bonus opportunity, along with strong benefits that include a generous salary, 401K + bonus, excellent vacation and work/life bonus, all in an extraordinary work environment. Reply in confidence by submitting your resume and cover letter to rroeser@theeisenagency.com.
I realize I've forgotten my all important paperwork and 2x2 passport sized photos in my nice neat folder by the door where I wouldn't forget it just after checking in at the ticket counter, but not before going through security theater.
Oh, I definitely left my tripod in Michigan, so until I make some friends here in the city, the outfit updates will be sluggish. Sadness.
Books completed:
source author for review
When the new moon (down the drain) outside my kitchen window
Kill Alex Cross by James Patterson
But the real power of the script came in the writers’ ability to tell a story. Again, so many new writers focus on how to string words together. And it's not that that isn’t important. It is. But it's not nearly as important as telling the story and keeping the reader interested.
No one was going to cockblock or stifle Ava Gardner's libidinal-elemental archetypal freedom. Not a possessive homicidal bullfighter, a racing car driver, or any of the would-be suitors who dash themselves upon her rocks. Only James Mason, the original flying dutchman who promises her deathless timeless love aboard his slick craft, even knows what to do with all her aching archetypal beauty. And he embraces her enigmatic grace first by painting her before she even meets him, and then after she angrily blots out her face with white he incorporates the white into a De Chirico type mask, restoring and enhancing her unknowable elemental mystery rather than trying to reign it in like all the other men. An archetype himself, he whisks her from the time-bound concerns of mortal men and into the constellations where she belongs, something born out not by the rather muted British direction but by Jack Cardiff's breathtaking Black Narcissus-level of color.
Special Offer to Celebrate the first ever TE Mid-Month Release:
Cookie.
Nutrition expert Dr Qudisa said if we wanted to change the situation, we will need to increase coordination in developing and implementing a coherent nutrition strategy. “The federal and provincial governments, international community and all other stakeholders need to react to this crisis now, otherwise the future of millions of Pakistani children will be at stake,” she said.
So look kindly on your own LMFs- sometimes we tend to put people off with our aloof nature. Sometimes we look like party poopers, or stick-in-the-muds. Rest assured though, we probably think about you more than you would guess, and our memories with you are cherished treasures for sure.
"If Not for You" by Bob Dylan
Me - "Well, you'd have to make it now. I have all of the ingredients. You can come shop in my pantry. I have a fever and I'm just so tired."
‘Be nice to people, not because you want them to be nice to you, but because you, ARE nice’
One of the best parts about going to a zoo is being able to get close to some rather lethal animals. Alligators have long had a bad rap along with their slimmer cousins, Crocodiles. Here are a few shots from a trip to Jacksonville Zoo in of course Jacksonville Florida – circa 2007.
Sweet angels and inner demons be played
I've been happily pottering away in the craft space, completely forgetting what day it was! In fact, it was something the EM said that reminded me. And for anyone not in the know, Wednesday is the day a great many crafters around the world reveal the state of their workdesk, aided and abetted by Head of Desks, Julia, at Stamping Ground - join in by clicking here.
The trick is to present him as objectionable because of his political views,yet, because he is dying of stomach cancer, arouse sympathy for him as a man. Another irony is this black comedy with tragic overtones deals conditions in an under-funded national health hospital contrasted comically with a hospital soap, like the popular Emergency Ward Ten of the time, being shown on the wards.
* Scavenging can also be levelled to some extent on your starting world, although again beyond some extra credits this isn't essential as you will level it anyway.
Gritters stuck on Haldon Hill, so even Pinhoe road is not properly clear. I walked over this morning to check (if it had been all fine, I was going to try and ramp the car through the 8-10 inches of snow on our road), but there was barely a car moving, which gave Exeter a very nice sense of peace.
But the truth is that not everybody in Hazleton likes what Maddon is trying to do. After all, he doesn't live here any more. He doesn't understand what day-to-day life is like here. He is a famous baseball manager now who deals with famous baseball manager things. There are some in town who feel like he is lecturing them, others who think he is well-meaning but unrealistic. The dinner is a smashing success, but one cannot help but notice that almost every one of the 560 people who attend is white.
The Good: Reich’s analysis of the structural problem under-girding the American economy appears to be accurate. His argument is well supported by short at only 147 pages.
Dusty could sing anything. On this clip she's singing one of her later hits "Son of a preacher man", the original of which was recorded in Memphis with Steve Cropper and the Muscle Shoals session players. This version, once again sung live on TV,is slighty slower than the original, but still brilliant.
There isn't much to say other than I'm overflowing with stress and anxiety at the thought of Anatomy and anything that has to do with it.
And wings on your back that you snapped off an angel you robbed
Ignorant, held?
Next week we head to Sebo late night to chat with Michael Black--our first off site podcast. The following week is hopefully the Ryan Farr/Eddie Lau re-record, and following that should be our East Coast-Skype recording. Then things get wacky for me (weddings, time off, etc) and for Corey (baby!) so we'll see what happens.
Finally, at 10:45, I left the building and drove to the clinic.
Not many days after we meet with her, we left the country. On the plane ride home my Aunt was sitting next to a woman and explained what we wanted to do. The woman listened intently then stopped her and said, "I am rich, my friends are rich, let us help you" WOW, what a miracle! I mean WHO SAYS THAT??!!! But the Lord wasn't done in helping Mrs Francois raise funds for her special school.
I should apologize for not posting for so long or something. I'm an unreliable blogger and I know it. I blog when I can or when I have something to say or when I feel like it. I do miss writing and the blogging community though.
But a man without a face?
"And what about you?"
Have a great Friday!
I also picked up a complete collection of Edgar Allen Poe’s works for $20, which was nicely bound and irresistable for the price. My last purchase of the weekend, though, has been far more entertaining so far– a t-shirt from Red Tie Products’ “Grammar Matters” (http://www.redtieproducts.com/). If you like language games or words, you should check them out. They are nerdy in all the right ways. (I’ll try to post a pic of this soon too).
The folks left Egypt after observing Passover. Before Yahushua left the earth, He too had taken Passover with His disciples on the night to be much observed.
Max Mosley is a different kettle of fish in many ways. His action succeeded because the paper had breached his rights to a private life. His was not a libel or defamation case. The truth of the allegations, other than the Nazi accusations, was not really part of the case. Instead it was about whether the public had any legitimate interest in these matters, as opposed to a prurient one.
To make up for it, here are a few more books in the Penguin Crime series.
This post was written Jan 6, 2012 (almost a month ago). Although it seems incomplete, I am publishing it anyway, because I know of at least one entrepreneurial friend who may benefit from reading this (yes, you A.L.)!
Well dear readers of mine whether you like it or not you are my tribe. You are the people that keep me going day after day. I know it sounds cheesy, but it’s totally true. I wouldn’t be the person I am today without you all. The comments, the emails and even the phone calls all warm my heart and let me know all will be okay when I’m freaking out.
I'm quite keen on getting a pirate-ey lifestyle, I like the swag and the swaggering, very fond of the rum and above all I love the hats. I've been doing a bit of research into the subject, here is one of my interviews.
There you have it – a short list of my favorite post apocalyptic movies. Some of them are considered classics and some of theme are considered a waste of film, but I found something to like about all of them. There are others that could have been included:
1. Farm Worker, age 13. This lasted for a month or two, the summer before the 9th grade. I had to pick green onions and radishes, and I hated every second of it. I wish I could point to this job and pretend like it gave me some much-needed structure, or that it taught me how to work hard, or whatever- but really I was a total asshole the whole time I worked there, I complained the whole time, and I treated it like an extended study hall, goofing off and wasting time. Spoiled rotten white kids for the win, I guess. In hindsight, though- I'm glad I have even a tiny bit of experience with the way farms work. '
It is absurd to suggest that Jackson and Sharpton ever would have interjected themselves into the Christian-Newsom case. Their interest is in protecting African Americans from racism.
Uruguay
This hilltop site above the city of Lhasa originally hosted the meditation retreat of King Songtsen Gampo, who built the first palace there in 637 in order to greet his bride Princess Wencheng of China.
This was a fun start of the series. I like Lacy’s how strange life is with all her gadgets and the many Christmas items that were floating in her living room it added to the comical part of the novel.
more stuff. better stuff. bigger stuff. nicer stuff.
Now, on to the next free item. The day we moved in, R picked up this grill from a multifamily on the main road. We passed it as we driving a little ahead of the Uhaul onto our neighborhood. R turned around and went back with my brother while I waited for the truck. It was really heavy and he needed the help of my brother and two other guys there to get it in the truck. The boys got it home and it was full of rocks (literally, giant rocks), extremely dirty, and didn’t work. Whomp whomp. The bummer with taking free things is that you can’t return them. It’s a big piece of scrap metal right?
4. What do you believe is the coolest thing about women?
Hailing from Ottawa, Werbo asks the musical question, “Jesus, Are You Santa?” in the quirkiest possible tone. Newfoundland is represented by The Mountain and The Trees, with the pop-folk “Winter Blues” that also features Ruth Minnikin.
Thank you again Jamie!! I loved it all!!!
April 17– Thursday– Churchville, Virginia– Serving with Stonewall Jackson, Jedediah Hotchkiss writes quickly to his wife, Sarah, explaining his scrawl. “I am so weary that you must excuse me – for I have been in the saddle nearly all day and want to go to sleep – and rest some before another start – for we many have to travel during the night – Jackson is very cautious and I do not think he will be caught napping.”
By the way, the Israeli Antiquities Authority continues to raise serious questions about the authenticity of the ossuary, saying it is mostly likely a forgery, despite the fact that the alleged forger was recently acquitted. Thankfully, Jesus only makes “authentic copies.”
They are really on trend as I see a version of this flower everywhere
I guess I've stalled long enough...time to get back to dusting, laundry, sweeping, mopping, bed making and everything else that needs to be done before the in-laws come...off to work...but first I'm running over to your blogs to catch up real quick!! ;)
Extras: SU Crochet Trim Victoria, Wild Orchid Craft Flowers, Doohickey Die Cut
Creative ideas are by definition novel, and novelty can trigger feelings of uncertainty that make most people uncomfortable.
And four white mice will never be four white horses.
Tactics as a gunner: Shielding in Halo is such that it takes a good number of hits to take down any one opponent. Focus on closer opponents far from cover, but be aware of the blind spot as opponents get closer in (in this instance it’s OK to jump out and try to melee them). The warthog’s gun is inaccurate at long range, but medium range targets should get the most of your ammunition provided your aim is precise.
Gove says pupils should study maths till 18
Level 4: MP Cost: 29, jumps for a certain distance.
Renew your passion for the language, pop the juicy words loudly on your tongue. Gobble verbs, masticate nouns and sieve corpulent adjectives through your teeth. Never slake your thirst or sate your hunger.
This is my 2nd post today. If you are here looking for my Tickled Pink sponsors Paper Sundaes post then just keep scrolling down or click right HERE.
All winners will be announced on December 5th.
Based on this, it is clear that the Bible follows the teachings and practices of the Catholic Church. Anyone who doesn’t understand this has things bass-ackwards.
Helmet Camera For Off Road Use – What Makes A Helmet Fit To Use Off-Road?
Seeing that her transaction wasn't going to be completed anytime soon, I made my way up front. I think one of the guys working was relieved that he could help someone else. I asked him for two pints - one Chestertown Buff, the other, Cork. I tried to give him sympathetic eyes. I hope he didn't think I was hitting on him.
Often, a person who is going out for a “hook-up” is said to be “lookin’ for a woman” or “out to get a man”. Nothing could be further from the truth.
ATTORNEY: And why did that upset you?
Skywatchers take note: The biggest full moon of the year is due to arrive this weekend.
Pandeva
She asked for several pictures of both Cassie and Savanna . This is one of the pictures of Savanna that I sent to Tina.
Question 2: Which country would you most like to visit whilst on the run from one or more corrupt government agencies, and why?
Bo Xilai, with his son, at a memorial ceremony held for his father in Beijing, in 2007.
I fell in love with cupcakes. Or maybe it was the buttercream? Either way, I'm now completely in love with the idea of these darling, little cakes - deciding on a flavour, combining the ingredients, popping them in the oven, creaming the butter and then having fun decorating. Oh, and the eating part too, of course.
I strongly encourage you to take a moment to read what he's said. You will be blessed. I have no doubt.
so the following are my little rules that have helped me be a traveler with a better attitude and outlook:
"I _____ have, this day, voluntarily enlisted myself,
So, firstly, we have Nunez-Tesheira’s apparent decision that the information as to CIB’s financial crisis – wherever it came from – was solid enough to take immediate steps to protect personal interests. Apparently, the public, proper duties of that office awaited an official letter. I tell you.
Drain the water from the tofu package. Place tofu block on a paper towel lined plate. Place another sheet of paper towel over the tofu and a heavy plate on top. Allow tofu to drain for at least 20 minutes. Pat tofu dry and cut into 1/2 inch squares.
Injury’s
Stacey & Leanne have turned out to be young ladies we are proud to call out daughters.
Unfortunately, we didn't find anything that caught our eye. Or as Lindsay might tell you, "there was too much blue in all of the carpets and we don't have any blue in our house." Alas, our little known dream of purchasing a carpet from a warehouse in the back alley of a strange neighborhood in Delhi was dead. At least we have the experience. I'm sure when we're staring at whatever rug we ultimately purchase, the lasting memory will be that of Farooq's warehouse; honestly, it may even become the story I tell when I grow old.
No trees in forested private lands may be cut without prior authority from the PTA. All forested areas in public lands are declared forest reserves. (Emphasis supplied)
exposure. Now, it is no secret that makeup helps women
Timon has a last name - Berkowitz - as revealed in Disney's Timon & Pumba series.
However, I will demand, and deserve, your respect back also, for how my family works.
New Holland Black Mad Hatter IPA 7.1%
I will pass over in unaccustomed silence the curtain lecture delivered to the party who had obstinately held to the view that there would be buses that did not figure on the timetable - suffice it to say that this party was male - which probably rivaled in animation the conversation taking place on the pavement, and tell you instead how we came to be there, in a hotel in the back streets of Coca Cola....territory where no tourist treads unscathed, according to the guide books.
Pyramid Snowcap Ale.
After a lecture on the brain development which I attended in the library last evening, I was speaking to a 47 year old man from the audience who had a 20 year old son. This nice man named William, was telling me how disappointed he was that his son was decided not to attend college. He said that it was "his dream" that his son did not make the same mistake he had.
Perhaps we will transform into a Euro-style state, though that was not a peaceful transition for Europeans, Ayers noted:
And The Times quoted English as saying, “Unfortunately, when things go wrong I’m the guy who takes the brunt of it…Look, it’s uncalled for. If I were molesting babies, I get it. But I’m not. I’m a guy with a dream trying to make it all happen.”
At the heart of any conflict is fear. It may be fear of losing control, fear of insecurity or instability, or fear of losing face. Once we begin a conflict, every ounce of our being may try to win at all costs. Our nastiest qualities can come to the surface as we fight to maintain whatever it is that we fear losing the most. To make matters worse, we all have “hot buttons” of insecurity that can trigger overreactions to matters that may appear trivial to others.
'Those girls had no underwear on. I﻿ should know... I was there. I was roadie and back stage they cheekily showed me. I thought it was cool for cats.'This comment has sparked a lively debate about its veracity and so on, take a read or just watch the video again.
With the addition of a new highway close-by our house, he has said the 45 minute, on a good day, commute wasn't nearly as bad as in previous years.
feel our song
#26 Tania Ridgwell
Me "Oh my heck Kam. Where did you come from?!?"
Don’t mind the poop, they are birds after all.
He can fight the plans he supported by, erm not supporting them anymore. Well, no - supporting them a bit, introducing charges, but lower than first thought. And he will do this by consulting local residents, after he has already supported the original plans, and which he will not dump, even though people will tell the consultation they don't want them. Got that?
On another level, Take Shelter is a metaphor for the tenuous grasp many of us have on what we’re sold as the American dream. The family, while in no way poor, is still not much more than a paycheck away from dire straits, and Curtis’s method to manage his madness complicates this in both subtle and overt ways. Some of this gets a bit heavy-handed, but Nichols has great talent as a director for creating tension onscreen, even in the segments not directly related to Curtis’s visions. It’s a real nail-biter, as Nichols and Shannon make it clear that Curtis may be capable of anything – ruination and salvation alike.
Ruby on Rails Developers are the core asset of Satisnet Technologies. We appreciate their professionalism and expertise in years of working experience with us. Our experts will dedicatedly work to develop Ruby on Rails application of any complexity in the short period of time, will suggest various solutions for making it much better with specific programming and finally test it.
or the cowlick
Mike responded that he and his new wife had an "open marriage". He did not have to explain this concept to me. It was something I had encountered before. Mike was a very attractive and smart man. I had considered him a friend. I guessed he had considered me as a potential bed-mate. Whatever. Even if it was fine with Mike and his wife, it was not fine with me. No harm, no foul. But we were never really friends again after that lunch.
(1) The Fiscal Compact, or officially the “Intergovernmental Treaty on Stability, Coordination and Governance in the Economic and Monetary Union” – it’s 10-pages long and takes a half hour to read.
It’s a little surreal because only a year ago I had no clue what I wanted to do with my life and thought that ever outside factor would influence my decision to stay in school. I stand corrected. Not only did I stay in school, but I finished.
We grab our popcorn and belongings and head into the theater. We decide to get a seat at the top because that’s what smart parents do. The big TV lights up, and I think we’re finally getting somewhere.
Will things compost more slowly than they did in my open-air bin (lack of oxygen?)...
The recent Chinese coup d’etat within the government was done by the Cabal, to keep this information from getting to the public. Keep in mind that the Cabal welcomes this fleet.
Since picking up my ipod, I have started loving. living. small. which has certainly led me down a creative and interesting road - one that I have embraced and that feels right for me (and is different from the career I had been doing and didn't truly love). Visionary Steve Jobs said it best when he stated "Most important, have the courage to follow your heart and intuition. They somehow already know what you truly want to become. Everything else is secondary.” There are many more adventures ahead and I will continue to enjoy my surroundings and follow my heart.
“And now I exhort you to be of good cheer: for there shall be no loss of any man’s life among you, but of the ship.”
Yes, I beat the chocolate mixture until fluffy and then poured it into the pie shells. (I doubled this recipe to make two pies. One for my house, and one for my office. Those dudes I work with are a bunch of lucky men, that’s all I’m saying.)
Front wing design will continue to follow the ever more sculpted path we’ve seen this year. As will the front wing mounting pylons, which will probably continue to lengthen within the tight definitions of their cross sectional area.
It feels a little wrong to have a favourite first sunday but the metaphysical treasure hunt was surely one of the most fun and insightful i can recall. A report will appear sometime soon but in the meantime here are the instructions so you can play it yourselves (pictures are some amusing signs I've seen recently and not related to the text)
As Summer slowly ages her way into her preteen years she has become much less interested in the things she used to enjoy doing with me and Toby. It's a normal developmental stage so it doesn't surprise me that she is losing interest in the things that we always have done as a family. We don't hesitate to give her her space and in turn we are entering a different season of our marital relationship.
It's time once again for this week's version of Weird Wednesday. This week's edition came up in a recent conversation over at Dreams and Reality when Juniper and I were comparing screws. Oh, get your mind out of the gutter! I'm talking about the not so little metal twisty things that are sometimes used to repair broken bones. She got her's as a result of a car accident. I got mine in the line of duty when I was a volunteer firefighter.
This storm was nowhere near a hurricane but it was severe for our part of the world. And we are still dealing with the damage it has caused.
The Mennonites were extremely gracious to us though we invaded their farms. I spoke with Benjamin our wagon guide for the large farm, and they only allow tours 2-3 times a year. They were wonderful, kind people who seemed to be just as curious of us as we were of them. Once the tour was finished we all went back into town and we had lunch prepared by the Mennonite cafe at a small local park. It was simple yet delicious with smoked free range chicken, home made bread rolls, cucumber salad, corn on the cob, and fresh watermelon and cantaloupe. My whole day was much more intriguing than I thought possible and I thank those farmers for allowing me to take a peek into their lives.
So I was sitting on the toilet...
Something I saw on a website many years ago struck me as clever. Imagine you have met a friend at a party and you want to describe a film you saw the night before. You’d only give the bare bones of the story, but you would include all the exciting and/or moving aspects of the film leaving your friend wishing that they hadn’t missed out on the experience. This is what you are aiming for in a synopsis. The bare bones, but told in such a way that the person reading the synopsis can’t wait to get hold of the book.
Did you know that CD cases make great gift items? They're relatively simple to decorate, and mine doubles as a mini accordion album with a gift card holder and a masculine nautical theme. Stampin' Up! products used to create this project include "The Open Sea" digital stamp brush set, My Digital Studio software, Cherry Cobbler Baker's twine, Bitty heart-shaped button, Itty Bitty Shapes punch (heart), "Nautical Expedition" designer paper, assorted circle punches, and "All Holidays" stamp set. This particular CD case was a bulk buy item that didn't actually have the
I wore it to work today, and I promise I wore shoes. (I'm lovin sinking my bare toes in fresh grass!). I did wear the little navy shrug sweater though. I'll probably wear it with a sweater or shrug most of the time since the wide straps aren't quite wide enough ( or the back bodice high enough) to completely conceal my industrial strength bra.
This of course, to me, represents so many things. I too was a butterfly that flew high and beautifully only to be struck by the lessons of life. I recovered though and no matter how painful the blow was I spread my wings and flew again…
Reviewed by Poinsettia
I wouldn’t use so much space here if they weren’t. In fact, I can say it, singular, because it’s one video split in six parts.
“Whether these people are actually in need of the laptops and will benefit from having one has no bearing on the fateful tick or cancellation on the list.
Meekins, a Vietnam veteran and former police officer, told the Tampa Bay Times that he couldn’t understand the airline’s lack of compassion.
Kiss Premium Eyeashes Black (01, 08) $1.99
I’d heard of them before – pretty cool gadgets that open the door in the morning to let the birds out, then shut in the evening when they’re roosted to keep them safe for the night. I put on my Google-Fu gameface and went to work. Sure enough, I found all types of doors available… simple to complex, hinged doors, vertical sliders, horizontal sliders…
You can see the AVCA National Championships April 27-29 from Gulf Shores, Alabama on CBS Sports Network.
Sometimes you have to ignore conventional wisdom.
Worst – Don’t write and drink. Just don’t. It’s not going end well at all. You’ll come back to your writing the following day and wonder what gremlin logged onto your computer and started randomly hitting buttons.
I wish you a wonderful day full of the things and the people that you love.
The downside of these shops of course, is the limited selection of sizes. With just one of everything, either it fits or it doesn't. Great bags, scarves and carefully selected jewelry however, offer ample consolation if you don't "trouvez votre bonheur" ("find your happiness," as the French shopping saying goes). But when you do score that coveted item in the perfect style and size, quel bonheur! Happy shopping.
It is quite the way to ring in the spring. (Rhyming! Huzzah!)
just to do your thing's
Around your table.
Moving on the real stuff. Part of the reason that I waited until today to post this movie review instead of writing it yesterday is that I wasn’t quite sure of my opinion of this movie at first. To be honest, I still can’t totally make up my mind. But mostly, I enjoyed this movie.
In one of the biggest such moves, the Direct Marketing Association (DMA), through its subsidiary, the Association of Interactive Marketing (AIM), has released online commercial solicitation guidelines in an effort to promote high ethical standards among marketers.
*comment up to 3 times!
I was concentrating on what I was doing, and as such, didn’t notice this beast coming up behind me. Then, while all was quiet, a thunderous RRROOOAAAAARR, the likes of which haven’t been heard since Jurassic times, occurred immediately behind my head. Not only did I jump three feet into the air, but as I did, I turned around to see this creature! Saarah thought that it was pretty darn hilarious that she had managed to startle me to such an extent. It was pretty funny. We all had a good laugh, once my heart started beating again.
My iPhone is the single greatest invention that has blessed my life, tech-nically speaking. My iPhone has replaced my bulky organizer and serves as not only my cell phone, but in a way, my life line to my family and the world around me. I use my phone for things like my grocery and chore lists, my family's calendar, expense tracking, and so much more!
Unless, of course, the monster is of godzilla-like proportions....And this sign wasn't very helpful. I'm not sure if they meant the whole alligator, when raised, was 4.5 inches high.... Or its individual, yellow, unbrushed, foetid teeth. Eek. They'd easily bite through a tyre. I looked around carefully. A few people were returning to their cars. The young woman carrying the box of papers and wobbling on her heels seemed to be pretty good bait for the alligators, I figured they'd go for her rather than try bite through the steel to get to me. Phew. Next time I'll park in a different car-park.
But it was the BBC (and to a lesser extent CBC and CBC Northern Service) which provided the daily stability - the continuous unexaggerated voice to navigate the extremes of bullshit, propaganda, and outright lies. They were the gold standard, and I became addicted, and remain so to this day. As I went to university and travelled abroad, I brought a SONY ICF-5100 and now, still possess an even a smaller version, that has allowed me have the BEEB with me, wherever and whenever, which was particularly important when travelling back to the USA where intelligent international news was and remains well-nigh impossible to find without a broadband connection.
The natural man, otherwise known as an unbeliever, is more prone to believe a lie than the truth. We know this is true but we also have God’s word on it. In 2 Thessalonians 2:12, they “believed not the truth, but had pleasure in unrighteousness.” Then in Romans1:25they “changed the truth of God into a lie.” That was intentional for they preferred that.
Second attention, however, is rooted in the changeless, and thus it protects you from the impressions made by stress and karma. This isn’t the same as zoning out. In modern terminology, second attention is like being centered instead of scattered, calm instead of restless, at peace instead of agitated. Yet, these are secondary to the deeper realization that you are not what you seem to be. You seem to be a body and mind tossed about by the winds of change. In reality, you are a soul undergoing physical experiences for the purpose of evolving until you fully know who you are.
I simply cut using my craft knife and to begin with a metal ruler to ensure the edges are straight - if you look close enough at the tutorial photo's (blogger playing up!) you can see my edges are straight - but by holding the book half open and checking as you go your craft knife will generally cut fairly straight - be warned it took me just over an hour to cut out the shadowbox hole and had a sore pointy finger for a couple of days!!!
reality churning itself in it’s own pace,
Crop failure in Indonesia on account of disease has led to a sharp drop in production. It is expected to take three-four years to return to normal conditions. As a result, “clove prices will remain high till 2014. New crops take nearly four years to grow and fruit, while on the other side, demand from the Indian and world market is growing,” they said. The latest development is that China has also been buying huge cargoes of cloves, pushing prices up further,” trade sources in Bangalore told Business Line.
- For congested babies, run the hottest shower you can, aim it low so there's a place for you and your baby to sit out of the direct water line, and close the shower curtain around the shower to contain the steam. Sit in the tub with the baby (or sit them in their baby tub) to help clear their sinuses.
Lastly, when someone is called into ministry, the only opinion that really matters is GOD’s. Yours does not matter. When we give unsolicited advice we’re giving ourselves more importance than we actually have. It doesn’t really matter what we think – it’s what God thinks that matters, and it’s God’s job to convict his servant and to direct them in the way they should go. I do believe that there are times when we’re called to hold each other accountable, but accountability is in regards to sin, not in regards to people doing things we just don’t agree with for our own reasons. I also believe that God uses others to speak wisdom into our lives, but that wisdom is supposed to be spoken in love and in relationship.
This shot was reproduced in various newspaper articles throughout the United States about shows in which I was going to be appearing. In fact, I even used this photo for publicity after I left the Ken Griffin Show in 1977. Below are a couple of examples of articles that used this photo.
Whenever I invite people over for a meal, I get all worked up and start planning for a 101 things to make. I even buy all those ingredients for the 101 things and since my organisational skills are extremely good I end up cooking the very last moment, panic and in the nth hour decide to not make half of the things I planned on preparing.
One said accumulate, the other
Don't be surprise if he comes home one day and I've done a quick re-vamp to the space.
we would like you to come up with something song or film inspired
now I don’t know where this voice came from even though it sounded like me, maybe the failures have taken their toll and I’m delirious but this voice had a point. Why should I give up?
Behind him, the trees weaved an ever unravelling canvas.
bed
Can patter out their hasty orisons.
In the last few days an event occurred which will remind many of the whisperings of Uhuru. As reported on My South Africa Sucks, the Johannesburg based political party the Pan Africanist Congress of Azania (PAC) has come under fire after messages urging the killing of whites were posted on its Facebook site. (Read the story by clicking here)
Themes & Things: Bad Island is loaded with themes appropriate to an adventure story and a shipwrecked-on-an-island-with-your-aggravating-family-possibly-forever story: most notably, though, it's a story of forgiveness, courage, and trust.
I could tell you, but then I'd have to kill you.
So what have I learned in my first year as a “professional”? Taking the lead from Wheelan, I would love to share my tidbits of advice for those entering the “real world,” especially for those in public relations.
- Awesome Awesome Butter Cream Coconut Cake
Thank you for the opportunity to interview at Ponce Corp. After receiving a rejection email from (HR name here), I would like to be reconsidered for the (…) position. I am sure that your company bases all its decisions on well-weighted examination, but I would like you to reconsider my application. I am a perfect candidate for the (…) position at Ponce Corps, Atlanta for these reasons:
First off, take the cover. See the guitar in the snow globe? Homage to Criss Oliva, original guitarist for Savatage, brother to Jon Oliva, whose life was ended by a drunk driver? Maybe. It is who I thought of upon first seeing the cover.
The partnership between the Rob Dyrdek Foundation (RDF), Street League Skateboarding and the City of Los Angeles will yield the seventh “Safe Spot, Skate Spot”, a program developed by the RDF to support legal and safe skate spots for communities interested in developing legal, skateable plazas for their youth and families. Based on the skate plaza concept, the Safe Spot, Skate Spot program provides an alternative option for communities with limited budgets or space restrictions to develop real street-skating locations.
I fully expect more hard times on the hardwood. I hope for the best, but you have to be realistic. After all, it’s a small military school with no hoops tradition whatsoever. If Charlie Brown were to have a favorite college basketball program, this would be it.
*Sigh* Don’t you love when you have an author that you just know is going to wow you? Over the past couple of years Catherine McKenzie has become one of my go-to authors. I wait impatiently for her to have a new book out, then do what I have to do to get a hold of an ARC. Then I devour it in one sitting, hug it to my chest happily and begin the whole process over. Seriously.
If I wanted to do meet and greets, I'd have become a public speaker for God sakes!
"When the white shirts show up at a crime scene they try to tell us how to do our jobs," the detective went on. "'Oh look, you got a shell casing over here, better take of that.' Thank you, but I do things in order. But they don't care. They come marching through evidence like they're important, wanting to look sharp. Especially if the press are here," he said.
Leave me a comment for each time you repost.
* I thought the crust was baked a bit too long. But my hubby liked it. So I'll blind bake the crust again for about the same amount of time or just a touch less - so maybe 20 minutes?
Publisher: Akashic Books
to their real quality.
The school that our Mimi want to the last half of the school year here in Texas was very and I stress VERY unimpressive. There were many many things that upset us over the course of the school year that were never 'taken care of.' And in all honestly we were made to feel that just because our daughter was scoring well on her year end tests and because the state gives them money for her being at school- THAT is the reason why they wanted her there. Not because her teacher wanted to teach and she had a love for it, and to top it all of 'they' made my daughter feel like the odd ball out with her blond hair and blue eyes. I know sounds weird being the add ball out looking like that, but honestly she is the ONLY student in her ENTIRE grade that did NOT have brown hair and brown eyes.
Pantone just announced their Color of the Year for 2012, Tangerine Tango, a bold, reddish orange. Last year's color was Honeysuckle, another bold hue of the coral, pink variety. The Pantone company has been selecting a color of the year for more than a decade. Thoughtful research goes into identifying the color each year by looking the world over for trends, influences and happenings. The color's effect on the marketplace is far reaching, having an impact on everything from fashion, to design, to packaging.
but I would absolutely love it if you decide to become one!
Included in the show is designer and sustainability advocate Yves Béhar’s One Laptop per Child project, a.k.a. a $100 laptop, alongside images showing the remarkable change the initiative has brought to education systems and underprivileged schoolchildren in countries like Rwanda and Peru.
Perhaps I might. You never know.
But it was all a ruse. A hoax. A sense of false-security. Life was about to teach me another lesson: just when you think you have things under control, an SDF will inevitably try to yack all over your brand new brown sued boots. (I might be paraphrasing just a smidge.)
I stamped and cut out the tea cups then glazed them with crystal effects. The sentiment was selectively inked with coordinating markers then punched out with an oval punch. I added some faux stitching with a black marker around the sentiment, image panel and dsp background layer. The three patterned panels are from a new dsp pack in the Summer mini called Attic Boutique.
These are just some of the instances of Jack Cole battling Hitler. Cole was by means a standout patriot in his anti-Hitler/Nazi/Japan propaganda, but he didn't remain silent, either. His comic book stories are filled with moral outage, so it's no surprise that Cole -- a generally non-political person -- would be moved to speak out against the madness that infected the world at the time.
“By the way, the foul language, which is one of characteristics of guna tamas, shows a not sattvic attitude towards the sexual aspect of love and towards people in general — too.
Do you know exactly how and where your fan engagement came from with your fan base? Do you know how your fans and followers found you in the first place? Do you know what drew them to you exactly or are you just glad they are there and leaving that at that?
Here's a pair of lobster postcards to whet our appetites for these delectable crustaceans!
Bows and ribbons, flags and banners waved from everything and everything. We came together. We were one nation under God again. We were humble and grieving, but defiant and ready. We were bent, but not broken.
Professional mariners Seafarers hold a variety of professions and ranks, each of which carries unique responsibilities which are integral to the successful operation of an ocean-going vessel. (From Wikipedia)
I’m not going to discuss whether or not Mitt Romney would have made the same call, instead, I am going to look a bit deeper into that “gutsy call” that Obama made. First, there was this response from Veterans for America.
EDITED 2/23/12 TO ADD: On Feb. 21 in an Atlanta court, Gross pleaded guilty to wire fraud and money-laundering charges, as well as an additional scam, in which he posed as a lawyer and took millions in legal fees from a couple who believed he was representing them in a real estate lawsuit. He'll be sentenced in May.
I found myself less interested in Hugh and Julia’s story line but I think the author herself was less interested in it also as it always seems to take a bit of a backseat to the story of James, Kate, Joss and Beatrice Bachelor, the spinster that James knocks off her bike. I liked them both well enough but they seemed less flawed, less involving than the chaos happening in the other story. Although I found it difficult to relate to both of the issues within the relationships (after all I’m not 60 and haven’t lost my job, nor am I discontent with my situation) I could relate to many of the interactions between the characters.
Number of typos I've spotted so far: 1 (p55)
-B
greatest gift I can give right now is that of a loving and supportive presence. I won’t be able to quantify the results of my work. I am not at peace with this.” The Western, results-oriented culture was a deeply written part of my identity. But I had reached a place where I was no longer as able as I am in my
It only took a year longer than the 2 months planned.
I often think about the direction my living room sliding glass doors face. I live in a condo and I do not have many windows. I only have three windows and two sets of sliding glass doors. Even with so few windows, my condo is filled with light during the day. The most wonderful time is in the mornings. My balcony faces east and as the sun rises, it shines into my home to wake me up and help me start my day.
